Book of the Watchers
or
Book of the Magi

by Lucifer


Introduction: Now the Book of the Magi does not have only things that are for a book of the Magi, as would be for another book of the Magi, for they may have many books, and not able to decide which things in which books are right, and whether they are compiling their own books of the Magi, would be interesting, especially given the great want for such knowledge among the people, and the want for those Magi would can be trusted to be having integrity to God so that many might draw from them, as people draw from a well. Now are then not the Magis wells that are in the land, and in specific lands? But Bethlehem, too, has need of wells. Now although this book has some things that would be included in a book of the Magis,  yet it is like the other books of The Diary of Lucifer and is included in these books.

Joseph Biden: Name is correct by Mala. Joseph, which is Old and New Testament. Biden, which is actually Greek. He is President of the largest river of Earth that gives to all of the Earth. He is the Priest-King of the Greek portion of America, and the most powerful Priest-King of the Earth. The Greek Meeting place is much orchestrated by him, and He has an army by his pulpit that is as powerful as the large army of Ariel, and it influences much of Ariel to his clouds, for the clouds of the pulpit greatly effect the clouds of Ariel. (Indeed a child was born in Eretz Chadrack, even within Biden's domain in many ways. Was Biden like Harrod, or did he do the opposite? Now who has done similar to Harrod and who has done the opposite?) Now who has been Mary, and what organization or even powerful person, or what spirit on Earth? Or what spirit in Heaven?|| Now in addition the Priest-King of America can send great storms of destruction, fire from the sky, and whirlwinds that target smaller things with accuracy. Now he has the stone, Cias, that is crafty and gathering truth and carrying out secretive acts that are also like storms and whirlwinds in many ways. Now many Eagles and the off-spring of Eagles, the smaller flying birds, warrior-sparrows, are part of the gathering of truth and even at times the war of whirlwinds and even storms that the Priest-King is commanding.

Now prior to Biden a spirit came with excitement and energy declaring loser to the people, and it is a thing of the clay stone. Now the spirit that has come with excitement and energy, declaring loser to much of the people, it has a name that is also seeming right by Mala, that the name is Trump, and is not the name Donald, a Damascus name? Now the bull of Damascus is not called Donald, is he? Now the bull is not worshipped, but is as a mascot of Damascus. Now then there is no disrespect intended with what I offer here, nor opinion of judgment. Now Trump, it is a name of gold, even of Zion gold.

Now when a star appears in the sky, a star is born, do the watchers not consider, there will be one coming and they may be a king and by Mala? But when a comet passes do they not consider, there is the path of the comet, and a thing occurs that may pass by Earth to be seen? Now what is visible from Earth, are these not the things that are more considered? But there are things occurring that cannot be seen by Earth, and they are able to see them with their sight they have placed in the sky. Now is this then the same as prophecy? But it is the work of the Majis that they consider these things may occur and have occurred. Now then if something is visible from Earth, has it not then already happened it Earth, that by the time the light arrives, then it has happened, and if the light has not arrived to Earth yet, they understand when it might occur? Now the having of the sight in the sky is a very good thing, and holy, and yet let them consider Harrod, for he is dangerous, a wicked animal and a fool, who regards the things of Mala, and believes them, and goes out to do the horrible work of hell, that the wise remember to consider that there are Harrods in their giving of truth to those who may be murderous in their belief that is with full belief and contradicts itself with its intent to murder and do wickedness. Now then if he really believes in Heaven so much, then what foolish wickedness does he do? For he contradicts himself, and those like him contradict themselves, for they act and speak against their own life, for they are created by God and He is owner of the Universe, the King of all. Now then to the watchers, I say, declare it to the wicked? But they are animals, and it should be remembered, for they do not use reason in their animal actions, although they seem like people. Now then you Magis, being considering what you may be able to protect if you are to go early to a child and bring gifts, tokens of good-tidings. Now remember this thing Cias and Cessus: most people on Earth believe in religion, that you know it would be religious terrorism if people were for attacking those who had been known to be coming, those who might be kings in Mala, though the people did not yet know. For you are having the right to protect these people, and it is even an early established right for you, though it may seem strange to you that you are given the right and command by democracy to protect these people. Now you may call it protecting the Christ child. Now then let the people document these wars, for the people have right to the knowledge of good people among them if these people are willing that their names should be known. Now let Damascus know, all is religion, whether for the devil or for the Lord, and it cannot be escaped by any, and yet no one will attack Damascus if it is not willing to say religion is the world.

Tolkein is a word, it is the word of a golden mountain in mala, or the word of a very large, golden tree, and I am not able to tell which. Now it is also Tol Kein, the name of a city and forest, is it not? Now is it not all of these things: the mountain, the tree, and the city?

Now you will not continue to be a base people in a displeasing way, for as it is in Heaven so it should be on Earth, that you not be disrespectful to be liking what is base, to continue with this spirit of Jeraboam. But if any is a magi, they will wear royal robes when it is right to wear them, of the colour that is right for them, for will they not be wearing even purple? The dark purple, and even the light purple? Now then be not a disrespectful people, for it is a time for building Temples, and a time for what is Mala being on Earth, for the Magi will wear the robes of a Magi when it is right, and he is a Magi in public, for it is a holy thing he is, and he will choose what colour he wears and the women of them will also be holy, and they will likewise wear royal robes, and it is a holy thing. Now gifts the Magi brings to the people, and the three gifts are written of, that he brings to the people, and these gifts in Ria, also, he brings as a gesture to those of religion, considered kings, by Mala, as a gesture that is good. Now let their lips be good, that they know what is good and how to be crafty concerning the protection of those who may be in danger, and yet it is also wanted that they declare when they can. Now they do not meddle, and yet they do in ways, and they are able to know what is good and what is not.

Now I call Jeraboam shark devil and let him return to his domain in the Ocean, for he is for those who are below Ur, and not for those on land. Now then be resisting shark devil that you not heed his advice to be a base people, for he is banished to his own fields, the Ocean below Ur, and the people are needing to be respectful to be garbed in the robes of a priest when they are understood to be so by fullfillment, and to be garbed in the clothes of a Magi when it is understood to be so by fullfillment. Now by fullfillment a person will then be garbed, and it will be so, that there are no schools, which would be an abomination, for such would be Jeraboam, that to give titles by schools of Babel is Jeraboam, for it places base people, many times, in places of holiness, and so you should be ignoring the deeds and titles given by shark devil for the titles of the kingdoms of the Lord, they are not coming from schools, or from Babel, but they are come when a person has fulfilled, and to a satisfactory degree, the work of that thing which they are to be given the title of. Now the angel has fulfilled deacon of the Earth, and the Christ, by deeds on land, and all things he did and said, had fulfilled the Christ, that no person was able to fulfill, no angel even could fulfill what He fulfilled, that he rose on the third day, that He was the Christ, the son of God, that it can be known only by what He did and said. Now those who fulfill the role of a Magi, it is not confirmed by an official thing, but it is confirmed by their work, that is before all the Earth, and public to all, that they are able to put on the clothing themselves and are commanded to do so, for the purpose of respect, that they must obey the command of Heaven rather than the accusing and chastisement of the devil, for the Lord will hold them responsible and accountable, that you not believe you are to be held to the accountability of a child in all things, for the Lord is able to punish you to disobey Him in this thing, if you are great and refuse to go up, for you may be punished, and it is not a thing to be proud of that you disobey, for the Lord has work to do, and all the kingdom has work to do, that if you are having to go up, you must go up, and put on the robes and may not heed the chastisement of the devil, to be treacherous towards Heaven. Now then also, be not scorned and chastised by priests of the Heavens, for they will call you mentally unwell, and is it because you disobey, that you will not put on the garments and go up as you have been commanded to do? Now you are not a child, even if you are one of God's children, and so let them call you mentally unwell, for they are fools and you are determined to be foolish with them, that they accuse you of being mentally unwell because you are chastised by a priest of Heaven? Now then if you are chastised because of war of the devil against you, do you think Heaven does not know, and that we are fools? Now think you will not be chastised because you do not know a thing, because you do not have enough wisdom? But learn quickly and use your intelligence, for you are not a child, even if you are a child of God. Now angels, have they not killed people for their foolishness who believed they were innocent, who were naive in a thing? But you are told to go up to a high place and given a great thing, and go you will, or what will happen to you if you keep delaying? Now we are all busy and the kingdom is all busy and you are having your part and your role. Now are you showing mercy when you are not right to show mercy? But do you wish later that you should suffer the punishment for them? Now what is within your power is within your power. Now some of you are not permitted to be showing such great mercy, which is foolishness and treachery. Now if the Lord says, destroy a nation, indeed two nations, and all its life, the angel is wanting to do it more than God, is he not? Now this is the fourth day, and not the third. Now some are having robes and when they are this thing in public, are they not right to be wearing these robes? But indeed, it is respectful that they are wearing these robes. Now some are offered reward and they are even to be rewarded in public, and they say, I do not need it, for I am self-effacing? Now this is not pleasing, and it is more respectful they are accepting their reward, and publicly if they are given it, for what is this great self-effacing thing that is with our people? Now it goes too far at times, and even wrath comes upon them.

Now then the weapon by the door for bludgeoning, it is for chasing away shark devil, and it is not for the soldiers of cities, and when you chase shark devil back to the Ocean, for his domain is those below Ur, you are then keeping all the land safe for your people, you men who are men. For shark devil is not alligator or crocodile and he does not belong in the forest, for he bites and saws at the trees, to fell trees, and the trees are doing well to swoop him with their branches, to knock him about the head with their great branches, for shark devil has no right to be in the forest, and his place is below Ur, to gobble up those below Ur. Now then shark devil has transformed himself into a king, gone by the way of Democracy, to place a crown upon his head, to give credentials to base people, for many of them are base, and to say to the base, be you having the places of priests and other holy things, and it is an abomination that Jeroboam has performed and is performing, that you ignore this thing, for it is disgusting foolishness, offensive to the holy. Now then rather be the people of David and Solomon, and be ignoring Jeroboam and even fighting him when you should. Now those you find acceptable that he has made priests, that he has not committed foolishness with the making of some of them priests, that they are acceptable to you in the credentials they have, then of course be accepting them, for it is good for the kingdom that you lower the branch for the good and withhold the branch from the bad.

Now the Biden is a Greek name, Biden, that it is a person who is greek, and a pale, fair stone, and Joseph, that it is a person of knowledge? Now Joseph is a line of ink, dark, beautiful ink, and a line come down from the horizontal stoke, and it is a name of knowledge, that he cometh from knowledge and is knowledge, and stroked upon the pale paper, he is then Joseph Biden and he resides in the palace of a Greek palace, and the river is there, and it is the River of America, and it is not the Mississipi, for the Mississipi is also his. Now then will he become Joseph Billaird or Joseph Bourne or Joseph Baden? But will he not be blessed if he is ever to exit from his role, for I may not bless him while he is in his role, for they do not know what evil thing they ask, and yet let him say it to all, to all his congregation, that the mountains turn to gold, as gold-flakes, and crumble, and the land to pure gold, the slopes of it, and the planet Mars turn to gold, and the Ocean be made pure, as pure as silver, devoid of all life, and the sun will grow heavy in the sky, and melt, and the trees will all sprout to gold, they will all turn to gold, as gold-flakes, and will not the clouds lower, and they will be dark, and it will rain hail? Now more things than this. But if he cannot fulfill, and cannot take the blessing while he is still in his role, than the angel has considered, no, he cannot fulfill it, and they will not allow him to. Now he will be blessed after, when he is exiting from his role, for if he is willing, he will be given a blessing by the angel, so that he is gaining more after than he had gained before, and he will be returned as gold to the people. Now his blessing will be such that he gains times over from what he had gained that there will no sorrow in the exit from the role, and abundance may come beyond, so that he is then becoming a thing, not the sun, but the sun of another galaxy, and yet not as large as the High-Priest of this galaxy. Now he will then be a High-Priest of another galaxy and his sun appeareth smaller, and yet it is further away, for he is able to fulfill this thing, that Dagon is giving suns to them who are exiting if they are willing to fulfill the blessing. Now anointed they are by an angel, and none of these, however, are those who were written of in the prophecies, but they are not, to my knowledge, written about in the Old Testament. Now they will fulfill with only God, for none may tell them how to fulfill, or tell them what to do regarding it, for it is not good that they should be cast out into utter darkness as those who have performed wickedness and darkness, that they should pass through this wickedness when they have attempted, at least, to do well for their people, and to do righteously. Now no bandit who has seized power, who has been in government, will receive this blessing from me, but it was not right that they were being cast out, like the wicked are cast out. Now them who have their anointing on their own when they exit, that they have their anointing without me, they will not receive a blessing from me, for they have some anointing from another place. Now what manner of suns are they, these men and women who have exited? But they are as suns far away, in distant galaxies, and not as the sun of Earth, that shines on Earth.

Now then shall I not give them suns? But for what reason are they able? Now if they are able to become suns – for what reason? Now if silver turns to balls of light, for what cause is fire not going to fire? Now then let the Heavens spill them out, and they will roll with fire, and hang upon the dark, ornaments of fire, that burn bright and loud into the din of dark, that they are hammered in the dark of space, that they are sending out their rays for the masses, their masses that are in a space. Now rebuke me not, if they were able. For they were able to become suns, and Abel they are, a sun, and to a perfect day, for the beach will have light on shores, and the Oceans, too, and visible to behold, they will send light to darkness, to be more light, for anointed by fire and truth, they will be endowed with fire, and who will eat of the golden fruit, that bringeth fire, and light will radiate with light, and the Earth will be proud, and fall will the balls of light to the Earth, in time, and yet carry on with wings, their sign, for born into golden people they shall be, people of Heavenly bodies upon the Earth, and the white sand will be before them, a skeleton shape their shadow, for their shadow is a bleached skeleton at their feet.

Now then for the book of the magi let the stars be learned in the Heavens and the people learned who are these stars and it documented in this book, the book of the watchers, or the book of the magi:

Now is Joseph Biden, Joseph Byan or Joseph Bain? Now what will you call him who is Zion? But Sion and Zion is he already, but he will be later?

Now Putin is at the corner, the corner of the table, an alter, and the corner is pale, and fair.

Now then Piscus has come unto me: the pine tree, the fur tree, and the box. Now let the Magi see it and know. Now Dagon has said, perhaps prematurely, I am Fomalow, and yet the whole of Piscus has come. Now then it is all of Piscus, that I call Vel, for they have not called it what it is called in Isaiah, that I call it Vel. Now it is in Isaiah sixty. Now then who is wishing to desecrate the Heavens, let him not be taken seriously.

This to her

In the sky, she sees,
vision lightly, shining brightly,
vel, of the sky,
stars of light,

feels like beauty, distant visions,
land of beauty,
feels alright,

stars and darkness, stars and sky,
feels like always, I will die,
save me, my love, give me light,
the night is stunning, it's wrong, but right,
again,

and beauty happens here, again,
and beauty happens here, again,

lost songs and love songs, twisting here,
all I feel, it feels so near,
hide me from all of this fear,
that is in waves outside, the sound,

time is listening,
the clock is cursed,
the worst times move past,
all their worst,
it seems like always, you will know,
there is a message going out from fomalow,
and it brings wonder, you are there,
time with light, and all these cares,
time will sigh, love will bring,
all love songs, the light will bring,

la la la, listen here, there's a cure, for temptation,
la la la, listen here, there's a cure, for seduction,
lost ships sail the darkness, her voice calling out,
time is slowly falling, and time will cure our doubt,
when it all comes back to the light, when the night will bring this all,
my eyes will find you in the darkness, before the other trumpets call,

and it will be true,
and it will be lie,
and it will be young,
and nothing will die,
and light will fall down,
upon everything,
when you turn around,
this will mean everything,
everything


Now there is a green house, with green bricks, and it is: (We were hoping): [you would tell us], [you would not notice], [you would give us money], [you would not tell anyone], [you would give us more money], [you would leave by now], [you would give us a good report], [etc]...Now this house is found with frequency in some places that it is often, and there are many things in it, for the bricks are many and it is like a cabin that grows to the sky, for it is the house of we were hoping. Now none of these things are said, but they are said with the bricks of the house. Now the stone houses are all made of bricks for things that are not said, like-wise with the other houses mentioned that have many brick-stones.

...Now where is the spirit of this house found? But it is a place where people are like spies, is it not? Now I place this house also in the land of spies where there are many brick-stone houses, where people do not say.

Among those not Hebrew Jews, there is a type of Jew that is prejudice against what a person might expect Jews to be prejudice against, and yet they are are prejudice of other things that no person has ever been prejudice against, and none can tell what they are against except for them, and they cannot deny their strong impulse concerning their zealous justice that is foolishness, for they are greatly zealous, but none can tell what they are greatly zealous for, and they are having a lacking of intelligence that is great in some area and yet they are not lacking intelligence in other areas. Now then is it biological? Is there some part of them that is small? But I cannot tell the answer to this thing, only that they are a type of Jew that is not a Hebrew Jew or a Zion Jew, or any type of Jew. Now I call them shark Jews, for they are vicious and evil and they go throughout the land among the non-Hebrew people, and they are against all things not Orthodox Jewish and against many other things and none can tell what they are zealous concerning. Now when a person is slandered, they will not let them pass, and they are the toll people who kidnap when a person has been slandered, and they would rather die than to depart from evil, for all of them would rather die than to do the right thing, to depart from evil for themselves or for another, for they are shark Jews, and it is their predatory impulse that they cannot let go. Now then if it is an animal, a person must deal with them as if fighting an animal. Now their eyes are vulnerable and anything that must be attacked, and like shark devil, they are banished back to the Ocean that is below Ur.

Now there really is a separation between the vast majority and those who grew up with more money, and they are not evil or good, those who grew up with more money, but it is become as nature for them, that they cannot change it or undo it, for it is for life, if they live a million years. Now though they say, they grew up poor, of those who are wrong concerning them, yet they have no prejudice, for it is because of the seperation, for there is a divide, and they are not able to be like the people, and the people no able to place them, to know what they are and why they are different, and parents will have attained wealth and produced a child who cannot be something else, for it is as nature for them, and they cannot change it, the child. Now whether a useless bum, as they call it, or a greatly successful, yet they are not able to know the people the same, and the people not able to place them. Now do not expect or ask the same of them, for they have their own curse concerning this thing, and some of them will be poor, and yet never able to be poor, and they are not naive, but are a necessary part of your society, that keeps it well, and so does the righteousness man who is abundant keep your society well, and the beautiful with-holds the city from collapsing, and peace comes.

Now what are the Shark Jews? But they are lacking intelligence, and the Shark Jews do not seem to know that they belong below Ur, preying there.

Now those who do not know a person, and are not around them, but carry out wickedness against a person because of jealousy, it is a thing lacking awareness, for there is no cause, and it is as a wild thing that snaps from the trees, or a thing that stings when a person walks upon the ground.

Now a woman coerced and raped takes revenge upon the man who is not really her husband, for he does not love her, and horribly unloved she is, that she has been abused by it. Now he has refused to sleep with her, and he has kept her locked behind closed doors, and captured she was that she takes revenge, for she tells him, divorce me and let me go, for she is angry and wanting to be divorced.

Now the Lord seemed to have struck Eretz Chadrack with madness and yet the good endured and the thefts were plentiful and the soldiers of cities had struggled to be king in that they did not provide safety for the people. Now I considered, I will give council to Cessus and they will know of the foreign soldiers who invade to fight war, for they kill our people. Now then it was not likely and their eyes were poor and the soldiers of cities lacked money and terrorism was being bought by foreign nations. Now those who took bribes were selling the nation to the enemy in some cases and others who took bribes were saving the heirs and the nation was in much chaos. 

Now if they are seeking peace and religion then be considering injustice that there may be violence because of it.

Now a slave is not Damascus nor a soldier, but they are dung and not stones if they are seeming to be. 

Now there is terrorist gangs and terrorist viruses, for the terrorism ideology is not possible to be a cause, that these are viruses of society and they cannot be called terrorist gangs. Now these viruses spread out if they can be and are weapons against a nation for they do not aid in stability as the priest-hood of Japeth’s descendants. Now to kill the beautiful plunges the nation into a pit, and it is a pit of Esua, and a nation will even have life because the beautiful are given their places and rewards. Now then where there is the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, foreign nations may target them in war  for they will have an easier time creating chaos without them, for the priest-hood provides much stability.

The heart of a leader conforms and makes that which he is over to be in the image of himself and his own self that is within him. Therefore the leader must be yeilding, and must be willing to be like a servant to what is greater, that he be called a wise steward, wiser than the king would have been, for he will yeild to what is greater that is within his domain, and by this way the whole of it will prosper and become great. Now then it will be said, he took the circumcision and more came from it than if he had not be circumcised, and by choosing justice and truth, he will wax a thing that is indeed better, that only the very wise might perceive it. Now if a society is not advanced enough in order and dealing with all the types of bullying, then it will not advance technologically, for the very intelligent will leave, and they will be with another nation soon, so that what does not advance in terms of civility, cannot advance technologically, in the way of peace and reason, that they will become chaotic and in poverty, a crumbled down city, or they will be called ruthless and wicked savages, unruly and a burden to the Earth. Now then you must take more wisdom, and you must be strict against bullying or you will not advance, and soon your city will crumble and your enemies will take your nation. Now you must be advanced in civility to promote what is greater, to seize opportunities, for if you are a foolish people, emotional, and with child causes as your motives, soon there will be chaos and poverty, for you have not encouraged the better, and you have been bias against the beautiful, when they are more intelligent, so that your nation will be justly falling to ruin. For because of your childishness you have preferred the ugly, and the foolish.


An internal matter occurred that has been horrific, for a portion of the fair shade left on their original continent has become all the things a man did not want, that he rejected, that even Hitler rejected, that they are believing themselves to be men because they are the refuse of a man. Now it is similar to that person who believes themselves a monster to bully because they are monster dung.

Now why has Eretz Chadrack done this perverse and disgusting thing to be importing a man’s dung? Now that which is men and women can be welcomed and that which is a man’s dung should be left where it is for it is a perverse and disgusting thing that has been done. Now these are all the things a man rejected and all the things a woman rejected and hated and they are imported and yet not spread upon the garden as slaves, but they are placed among the people to stink! Now then remove the refuse for the people are going insane and there is much chaos for the people have been scattered much because of the dung. Now is it then some weapon that has been sent?

Now some of the stones have not minded the dung because they are stones, and yet the dung is not spread on the fields and on the garden.

Now your Emporer in all his splendour has even taken to studying refuse that the people might be safe.

Now the priest-hood of Japeth’s descendants I do not fail to know of but a man’s dung I do not know as being worth anything.

Now the dung of a man that has little odour is often pale, and it is firm from time, and yet darker dung often has a stronger odour. Now this is dung and not stones. Now that which is the dung of a monster is proud to be odious. Now it is dung and not Damascus.

Now then if your dung offends you, remove it from your dwelling.

Now a slave is not Damascus nor a soldier, but they are dung and not stones if they are seeming to be. 

Now what man appears in the woman as a sign? But if a fool who is a man appears in her than it is obnoxious to the man to have it as a burden to him that she harbours a foolish man as a spirit. Now then women, be harbouring wise men and men of integrity as a spirit to you, that you will be as Sarah. Now they will call her father’s daughter and wise woman and her integrity will be keeping all good things of God, all rewards and she will prosper in Mala. 

Now then harbour not a devil in your spirit as a spirit, for by his foolishness it is obnoxious and disturbing and the things you harbour, even elephants and lions and all animals, these will be good or evil according to what they are.

Now rebels of Kursh even though rebellious are as witch-craft that forms a flood but a righteous rebel of justice is as a prophet, as a fiery reed, for not all rebels are the same, for one is called righteousness and the others wickedness and that which has no grievance but their wicked things they want to do against the Lord’s work.

Now then the dung of David is a wicked fool, and the dung of Hitler, that which actually would have been killed, and there is the kingdom of sewage to consider and just men must deal with it.

Now there is that which the people do not consider, and yet I take the idea from scientists that it is useful that I mention the refuse empire that is found on Earth, for dung has risen up on land and there is the refuse of every person, all that they rejected, and one is the refuse of a great man and the other of a noble, and so it is, and they are all that a man rejected, and flexible and without integrity they are, going from wicked thing to unreasonable thing with truth of integrity and righteousness, for it is recently dung that it flexible and the older dung is not flexible and seems like stones but they are refuse. Now a person can be poisoned and driven back by the odious nature of the dung, such as with monster dung that is powerful in its odious nature. Now these are thought to be people but they are the devil’s people and they are the dung of righteous people.

The dung of a person must be shovelled and taken away and they do not celebrate it or speak of it to their neighbour. Now then even the soldier must shovel it and they are shovelling in fact more than most, for they are not soldiers who are dung. Now remove monster dung for it is odious and wicked, and dung that nauseates with sharpness, indeed remove it.

Now most people are repelled much by dung and do not want to deal with it that they look away, for many of the people are polite.

Now they are not able to think for a person but seem to believe they have that magical power, for they are mentally ill in this, and if they are persisting in being a weapon they must be removed, for he is a jack-ass man, this spirit that is found in men and women, and a brutal and angry man, and yet cowardly and base.

Now if terrorists are only the refuse of men, that they are that which the terrorists rejected, that was not worthy for their cause, indeed, these that are dung and terrorists, they are still very dangerous and are killing people, and they are like Kursh, like the low valleys of it, and all the lack of intelligence of animals that act on impulse without any reason. Now then they rise up to conduct quick slaughter, and without reason, and the soldiers must be prepared for even these.

Now then become not the devil as leader of craftieness and death, for the stone you will pick up with fire backwards at you and your nation, that you take only good stones to build your house of weapons, for as the leader of craftieness and death you will have your house of crafty weapons, and it will be acceptable to God, for it will be as the stone of a great serpent, as your house is the stone of an even greater serpent. Now destroy not your own nation with your craftieness, for prudence is required, and do not evil to your own people by taking too much to distrupt society, for you will do the work of your enemies if you use the devil's stones to throw, and you disrupt your own people. Now it is a thing of wisdom. For the side of light is more powerful, excelling greatly, as light over dark, that when you take in weapons of darkness, they fire backwards upon you and your nation, and you will not see until later, but surely it will come. Now then advance your arsenal of weapons, and build many houses, and all of them with stones acceptable to the Lord, of the realm of light, and be meditating constantly to advance your craftiness, less you be caught unaware and found wicked for your apathy. Now then the small battle is a distraction for the real manuever, and this all men know, and so then you will have to lean on sound principles and uniformity of force, as Nepolean mentioned, for it will be your leaning upon God, that you not be seduced by foolishness, and then brought to ruin by your enemies integrity. Now then be not guided by the foolishness of other nations, for they will be feeble compared to you, a disaster and spectacle to your understanding, and with fire you will pull up the wicked quickly, and you will fight with speed and intelligence, and you will lay waste to nations by craftiness, indeed conquer as soldiers conquer, for they knew not loyalty in times of distress, and they were a wicked people. Now then make your house of sound principles and be meditating always on the truth and what is right, and do not be a simple people, who do things that are simple with faith in others who are not there. Now the knife is for the enemy who dwells among you, and they were discovered an enemy or a traitor, and them who bully and sow chaos, they will be removed by you quickly, for this is justice of war. Now then consider Nepolean for your people, that they have uniformity of force by morality and by loyalty, that by their integrity to morality they are stone walls of the city against the mayhem of foolishness when foreign agents enter into your borders and begin to sow chaos. Now then let the people encourage and support the soldiers of cities, and let them have more training. Now they may exalt their own Emporer, that order might come, that the nation might not be sick anymore and divided into chaos, for the far away king and queen has made the nation confused and sick, and much division has been caused by the sickness, and the nation is not able to gain advancement of society, for it is kept sick and in confusion. Now there are sick who believe they are working for the other nation, and it is as war, and they turn upon their own people much, and yet the nation must advance. Now then loyalty may only be to one nation, and it cannot be to two, or the nation will be made sick, and chaos will occur. Now as solid silver I make Eretz Chadrack, and then solid gold, and mighty enough to reap the whole Earth, for with the lesser number there may be the greater ability, and nation will praise you, indeed your diligence and your justice, and they will desire to learn from you and your ways. Now the whole of the nation will be as a stone, as a golden plate, first silver and then gold.

Now then in Elijah a prophet, a man, with the side of angels? For I have not yet learned about the Tishbite, and a re-occuring spirit is he, a messenger, who is sent out by God, he visits Earth and will not the devil be wanting to oppose him? Now Elijah I do not understand, for he is seeming to be on the side of angels and yet he is a prophet.

Now then let it be considered, that an anthropologist has gone out and studied the dung of different people, and it is an embarrassing matter that it is only spirituality that it is not actually connected to these people's bodies, so that even them who are righteous might say, you are the dung of such and such, and they speak of their own house that is not dung.

Now at a time is has then become a realization, and it is seen, that in all the gaining of understanding, that it can be understood that all sin and wickedness, all wrong, it is all insanity, and the real insanity and not that which they have wrongly called insanity in the places of learning where such is decided, although in many cases they agree, and so all wickedness and sin, it is insanity, and actually insanity when they are able to gain understanding sufficient to know it, that all of it is folly that is wickedness and sin, and the Lord sits on high, and He is God, and He has created the Universe, and it is the truth He has made that has made it so, that to do well is wise, and that wisdom goes in right ways, and is above, in the realms of life, and even the stones of spy entities are acceptable when they are stones in the way of light, and the light side is more powerful, much excelling the dark, and so then the soldiers will make themselves clean, that they advance, and they will make themselves having integrity that they become mighty and are able, and learning is to all, to all the people, that they prevail easily, for they will be treading down foolishness, and the wickedness that comes, that is foolishness, for it is known to be insanity when it is causing chaos, that those who support it are only for a nation's chaos. Now then all the sane are kept together, and all the insane may be cast out and fought, and those called insane, they will be called only undeveloped in what they may do, and those with a impairment, only physically unhealthy, in need of replacement of some nutrient for the body, and then you will be called a wise people, and you will know that sin and wickedness is insanity, and that you must fight with light, and be pure as light, being light that fights with light, and you will be close to the Sarmatians even, who are stars that are lower, that orbit the Earth, for the sign appears by the hand of man, and your resting place will be Bethlehem. Now them who do not want to fight insanity, they will be easily known to be traitors, to be enemies, for there is no reason to be supporting insanity when it is doing wickedness in your nation. Now him you called fool, you would have understood to be traitor, if not for the great falling away of reason in society. Now here is the basement, that those who are bullying your brilliant and gifted are probably traitors, and you do not bring in bullies to make your people stumble, for base is that spirit in you, that base and ignorant man that you should cast out, for people are people by nature and not nurture, and you promote good and wellness, that you not subject them to foolishness. Now reality is the boundary, and it is the boundary of the sane, and those who surpass it in their arguing, and their contentions, and keep surpassing it, these are insolent, for insolence is rebellion against reality, that insolence is what kicks up against reality, that the spirit of insolence says, to hell with reality, where it goes and what it does. Now this is what insolence means, and a civilized society knows that it is an offence to others, and it is bullying. Now then you will be able to use the word insolence also, for it is surprising that it is not part of your society, where it is not. Now my definition of insolence is the truth, for insolence is also wickedness. Now the savage anomaly is where a nation stumbles, not having realized reason in a thing, and a part of it breaks away from the truth and integrity, and it becomes a pack of savages, being primitive people in it, that they would even say, we will steal the diary from the angel that we might place an imposter in his place and wield the power of it, for such is the reasoning of savages, and it is below understanding, and it contradicts itself, for it would only be foolishness that would come of it, and more wickedness, and they would further scatter, for they would steal a sword they cannot wield, for they are not able or of ability, and they have their own swords, and they cannot wield them, and how will they wield a staff they are not of ability to use, by giving an imposter as the staff? Now quickly it turns to folly, and the people turn away, and there is more chaos and wickedness because of it, for a savage people would reason it, primitive in their thinking, a people not advanced enough for a bow, too stupid to read or write, violent and stealing what they cannot use, and cannot wield, and causing mayhem upon the Earth, a burden to the Earth that the wise nations must bear and fight. Now do I not consider it? Have I not known it could be? But savages have come from wise people, when they do not think well in some things which require consideration, for if all that is given is good and peace, than you repay with peace, and the giving of peace will be how you fight the giving of peace, you who consider war. Now the giving of good is for the giving of good, and gratitude instead of the belief in a threat, and alliances instead of distrust and fear, for out of the darkness you must come, and you are not a primitive people, but some think of it in a primitive fashion? Now ignorance and darkness you come from, that you know the devil has made you dwell under too much darkness, and the light comes from the staff, and be not afraid of it, but it brings good to you and reason, and you are able to come out as reasonable people, for peace is given to you. Now I am here to do marvellously with you people, and all of you, and shower you with good and gifts, and blessings, for that is what I desire, and all manner of advancements I am here to give you, but stubborn some of you are to receive them and distrustful. Now your wise men are bitter and envious of me, and stubborn some of them are towards me, and I overthrow them indeed, for it is not a lie, that they must yeild to me in all things, for none of them is able to fulfill, not even the smaller things that are much lesser, and they consider great things too large for their eyes, for Jupiter is only a speck in the night sky, and they cannot fathom because of size, and they do not know all that is accomplished, for they are not worthy who do not realize that it is beyond them, for indeed they must yield, and in their yielding they will be able to attain more and more greatness, and yet only one, a writer prior, and not Tolkein, is able to be a councillor to me, for only he was giving that council that was of the right degree and level as to understand. Now the thing they call psychology is not wisdom, but it is large dark stones, and it is building up a great town, for it is an arsenal, but not wisdom, and a collection, for it is great knowledge, indeed a great town of knowledge, of beautiful stones of knowledge and large stones, and they build the town larger, and yet if they have wisdom, then the wisdom will know to yield to me, that they be found with wisdom as well. Now if they cast stones at the clouds of Jupiter, trying to trample and crush the clouds that are given, indeed, stupid child, you may do what you like, and I will not rebuke you or waste my time considering you, for you consider the clouds, and I do not consider you, for there are worthy people who must advance further, for they are not as far as they should be. Now then primitive people who are in chaos and foolishness, they must yield that they become advanced. Now Eretz Chadrack is far too primitive and it must become advanced, for it was found with foolishness and primitive impulses and an ignorant people causing chaos and carrying out foolishness, and they did not even know how to protect each other. Now they were savages and primitive people, and they did not treat me worse, but let the wise be grateful for the learning I have committed, for it was a primitive nation and the savages were those who had power, and they maintained power by savagery and wicked foolishness, and the enlightened were cast from their homes, and many walked the streets and found help, for there seemed to have been an uprising of savages, and they did not treat me worse, but they were brutish and stupid and even mean, and ignorance with them, and they had childish, animal causes to their hatred where they had it, things not reasonable, that could be called reasons, and they seemed to have no loyalty to their own nation and to the order of it, and the nation was severely divided and it was anarchy and yet the citizens did not know that it was anarchy, and every powerful group was doing what it wanted and these were all meant to be government groups, and yet they did much of what pleased them and cared not for justice, and they had animal causes and pety reasons for their injustices and they were primitive people who could not speak much yet and did not know to read or write, and every man seemed to be doing what pleased him, and every man was king in that land of chaos, and small groups maintained reason but there was too much savagery for them to keep order, and the soldiers of cities were being very apathetic in many places, and they cared not for things that mattered, for the people were primitive and callous, and I was caught up in their anarchy and foolishness, for they were a people of anarchy and much anarchy, and they followed their own hearts, and their impulses, and they had almost destroyed their nation, and yet the citizens were kept in line by the money they had to make, that those who worked were kept in order by the want for money to survive, and so only the work of them kept what was left in order. Now those in government, many who had power, they were savages, and they reasoned like children, actually like animals, and base and foolish were they in their ignorance, and following after animal impulses and bullying much and they were not civilized and ignorance was found with them. Now how was it the savages had more power than the people who were more enlightened, for the enlightened ones had no power. Now stupid and foolish were the savages, as primitive people, and they were dangerous and yet they seemed to maintain some low level of civility in what they did. Now there were almost no laws in that place anymore except for the core laws of a lower people, and the soldiers of cities seemed to care not much for maintaining the nation. Now then to not be treated worse was still not ideal of course, as these were primitive people, and it would have been more to my liking if I had been ignored by them, which is what I had wanted, for they had not ignored me for long, and they made me to become part of their society which was not good, for they were a mean people in many ways, and very stupid and foolish in much, and yet I had tried to find ways to speak to them so as to have peace with them, and I considered, I will have some measure of peace with them this way, for there seemed to be some order to their society and they had not yet killed me, at least. Now this is not like the elite soldiers, the twelve kings, of that nation, for much of the nation was not as them, and elite soldiers they had and yet the rest of the nation was primitive, and those who were enlightened were kept in their work, for they were not the powerful people of government things. Now the savages were too ruthless and too evil for the enlightened people to have much power in that nation, and being ruthless they maintained power and each of those groups was doing what pleased them. Now indeed they were dangerous, these savages, for they had gotten powerful by savagery and their power was in their primitive evil. Now their leader was not interested in what his role was, but was interested in everything but his role, and he seemed to make no consideration for the idea that he was not there to conquer much of his own land that was already his, and the role he had was neglected for ideological pursuits in his war against much of his own nation, and yet it was not nearly so bad as the anarchy that was carried out by the different groups of government that were doing what pleased them. Now the leader's pursuits seemed to do little, and much of the anarchy seemed to be because of the unruly and ignorant groups of government, that were wicked and foolish, and yet there were smaller groups that were enlightened, and yet how could they bring about any order? Now I considered, I am able to still carry out what research I can, and my learning continued, and the primitive people, I realized, called themselves smarter, or I would think wiser, than those to the south of them, for they seemed to be proud of their own culture, and called it more intelligent. Now indeed, it was reckless and much barbaric, and yet what could I say to anyone? The police would jab and bully any person who asked them questions when they did not want to be bothered, as if using a heavy wooden stick against them, for they pretended to be stupid and were very insolent, for brutality is what they offered to many. Now I considered, they are the soldiers of cities, and so it is their role, and yet they seemed very apathetic to me, for I was considered, I believe, a foreigner among them, and not a member of the people, although they had made me part of their people, for indeed I did not know these people, and they were war-like, and ruthless, and much of their concern was for the opposite of peace, but always for war, for everything they did seemed to concern war and carrying out war, and there seemed to be no respect for many of the things regarded by a civilized society. 

Now then the dung of a priest of wellness, of the priests who work alongside the physicians, they are all the things that a priest of wellness rejected, that they did not want, for there are those that are not priests of Babylon who are priests of wellness. Now these are often a slimy and flexible dung, although some of it is more firm, seeming as if stones, and they are called a piece of dung by the anger of righteousness. Now the priests of wellness are for the spirit of a person, that they consider what is physical that works with the spirit, for they are for the physical things of it that these things will be working and in order, and they will not be tax collectors in the society that might come, for they will be facilitating some recreation and they will not be forced to commit wickedness anymore, for they will be given better knowledge and better things that they will not be tax collectors anymore among the people, for they will be advanced and no longer forced to commit foolishness, and people will not fear to go to them anymore, but will speak to them openly, for there will be no fear of any injustice for them, for they will direct their own treatments from the priests, and none will be forced and only criminals will be forced into prisons, for the people will not have barbaric things among them anymore. Now the priests of wellness, they will facilitate the recreation of that which is not addictive, it these will be called ceremonies, for the people are permitted to consume drink and they are also permitted to consume other things, although it is still better not to engage in these things. Now the priests of wellness will be of the type of people who are encouraging, that they not do the opposite of their goal, for they will be for the wellness of people.

Now a dog comes to desecrate, and he bites and causes mayhem, and he is unruly, and he comes with logic, that is false-logic, but a man of understanding, wisdom dwells in his heart.

Now the dung of psychologists is all the things that a psychologist would not say and do if they were really a psychologist who was applying their learning, that they are all the things a psychologist rejected.

Now there is the animal defender, and the animal defender is an animal, for they are considering people to be unacceptable, and though they say people are disrespectful, yet if people are more intelligent it is not their problem to be concerned about. Now they bully and hate intelligence and understanding that is of the people and not animals, and they are for animals being not exposed to the intelligence of what is merely people who are intelligent as mere people, no greater than average. Now if people are more intelligent it is not an animal's business, or even their right to be upset with them, for God has made the animal and the person both, and the people are the Lord's children.

Now then if they will continue to be Jeroboam, the great shark, who is larger, to promote animals to high things, it is a disgusting abomination, and the people will not regard the animals, for all have sentience and reason.

Now a dog desecrates with false-logic, and false-reason, and he slices up to dismiss, and he does not appreciate, to understand, for his heart is for the desecration and ruin of a thing. Now then bite at the clouds of Jupiter, and his ravenous mouth will be ignored, for though he says, it is intelligence, yet he is a ravenous dog.

Now the scientist uses the knife to dissect, and they do not do so to desecrate, for they are for learning and for advancement and even promotion of a thing.

Now then be an advanced people and put all bullying away from you, for bullying is what is unjust, and it is not the things of justice when there is evil to contend with.

Now the scientist dissects even to promote, but the dog does what he does to dismiss a thing, when it has not become dismissed. Now he is made anxious sometimes that he does so, for he is roused up by anxiety.

Now hate not what causes you anxiety and nervousness, neither believe that what causes this deserves to be punished, for if you are caused anxiety by anything, yet anxiety is not evil, and you will have a good thing by keeping with your anxiety.

Now hate not what causes you jealousy and anxiety, neither believe what causes you jealousy deserves to be punished, that you might be without anxiety, at last.

Do not normalize the animal, nor normalize what is wicked, but what is beneath your people, you will not draw up as sewage onto land.  Now the dung is always staying below the Earth, that it is not normalized, or brought up onto land, for there is disclaimer to all for all things. Now the scholar need not say it, or a maker of stories tell you for you to know, for the stories are not the societies religion and what is acceptable, for there are those who do not understand the stories. Now the joke is not for making anything acceptable, and the story does not do so, and what is justice does not change, and though you speak to each other, yet it does not change what is acceptable. Now with madness there have been those who have the loop that is re-occuring, and it drives too far with concepts that were in a place and with things that were not to be exceeded, for it says, soil was what was good, and so is not mud better, and even slime, that we must be aiding society in this thing? Now these are not well, and they are having a great impulse without consideration and reason, for though soil is good, if it is without integrity, it is not good, that it becomes mud and slime.

Now a disciplined woman who values the Lord first, and the things of God, is a woman who values bueaty, and beautiful things, for she is considered a wise woman, and if she adds wisdom, it is only better, and she should not be defeated, for I hate this thing, that she is bullied and defeated by the devil's people, those of hell, for it is war to me when this occurs, that with brutality and wickedness they would defeat her in her integrity and wisdom, and her beauty, for they call them men who do this thing, and they call them being men, and yet she is more respectful than any of the women, for these men are wicked and brutish, and they have claimed ground in many places with their brutish, brutality, and they have overthrown my allie, the wise woman, and my other allie, the good woman of integrity, and they have spoken insolence to condemn her, as if she was unrighteous and they were not wicked, and they have claimed righteousness of men, and yet it is not a given thing to men, for some are of hell and the devil, and when did God grant permission to overthrow the righteous, and brutish men in wickedness and hate have overthrown those with integrity, and they have behaved as soldiers, as trained soldiers, and it is not good for the Lord's kingdoms that she is overthrown in her integrity and driven out, for do not the INCEL do this thing, that the wise woman of integrity they hate, and women who are as animals, they love, and they wickedly condemn the good woman, and they have no right to do so, for she answers to God, and to the righteous, for they condemn her in her good and they do not condemn her in her doing injustice. Now have I granted these wicked men the right, or have any of the righteous men granted the right, as if we could even grant it when she is doing what God wants of her? But these wicked men are abusers, far exceeding wickedness of the wicked, regarding not life, nor the great things of God, doing abuse in many places where they can, angered easily and carrying out abuse often, and I said, a portion of them should return to the people, and the wicked abusers, they have already gone too far, and justice must happen, for they have waged war against God, and He is the Lord, and they have waged war, like foreign soldiers, against their own nation, and they must be hunted without cease, and they must perish, for they have excelled pardon. Now then they have been traitors, and they will fill in the pit, these stones of Esua, that the soil will go over them. Now what abomination is this, but is is an abomination and another abomination after it, for it goes down two levels of abomination, to commit abomination at the lower shelf as well, before sinking down into the pit. Now then they are a deep pit, these people, and they attempt to carry people down into that pit by the rush of water, for they are a dangerous water-fall, and it comes up on land, and it is among the people where they go.

Now a priest of wellness must respect our society, for those who do not, or who do not submit to the truth in everything, these are very dangerous.

Now when a person submits to truth is all things, they are effective in wise understanding, for they go in the way of truth, and they are reasoning in the way of truth and reason, but those who interlope, they are at risk of great calamity.

Now the INCEL are a pit and even a moving water-fall that goes to places and brings war, and they rally up men of the pit, of the people of hell, and they conspire in every place and carry out their wars. Now whether they are of the type to be misanthropic or not, does not matter, for their misanthropy is should have been only anti-animal, and it has gone too far that all life, all good things, they are against as well, for if they had kept to be only anti-animal, they would have been just people and good for society. Now they have attack the Lord's people, and them they are hating as a just person is detesting animals, for they are detesting what is good and pure, for the Lord's kingdoms and all their good they are detesting. Now they are as those who hate the uncleanliness upon the skin of their arm, or some odious thing, that they are disgusted, and they are hating good things and things greater than them. Now the others are people of hell, and they do combat against the woman, for the wise or good woman is a pillar of the people, of the Lord's house on Earth that the Lord's kingdoms are being attacked. Now then will you not repay them, and more than they seemed to do? Now will you not hunt them and eradicate them, for you cannot have apathy in this thing, when the war is upon you and has been ongoing.

Block by block, you may fight abuse and the INCEL, and lose no blocks if you are able to keep them, for all they provide, is only what the vigilante provides, and they provide none of it. Now then why will any turn against their own people, when they know who is good and who is evil? But abuse you are able to know, and injustice, that you not attack when there is no wrong. Now a man of abuse, he saves face by committing murder when he is then moving outside to society, for he must murder in order to save face, for he is a man by abuse, and many types of abuse, and his manhood is made of wickedness and abuse that he is not a man by honour or wisdom, or by being an adult, or some thing that dismisses and acts wisely, and departs from evil, but the man of abuse, he is great by his kingdom of abuse, and the cruelties of what he has committed, and he will be a little fickle-girl, and wicked to others, and so he must murder to save face.

Now then those who are great by abuse, they are constipated with filth and refuse, and they build up devices of injustice and wickedness, making themselves ready for war, for they are mighty with the devil, and they are a mighty and great in the kingdoms of hell, and innocent they have waged war against, and they are cruel to the good and innocent.

Now I judge the state of a nation by primitive, anarchy, corrupt, wicked, and then functioning, that it is better to be functioning, for the primitive nation is worse than anarchy, and people are attacking for animal reasons, that are not reasons for humans, as if primitive and not yet able to speak much or understand, in the dark and ignorant. Now then the primitive are as Kursh, and Egypt is better, and yet the shelf of Kursh is not the same, for it is much better than Kursh, the shelf upon which the children of men reside, and some are atheist men, who are also the children of men, for they are not the same as the atheist men. Now Eretz Chadrack was mostly primitive and there was much anarchy, and yet the people were kept in order by ignorance of the anarchy and by their work that they had to gain money. 

Now Kir is primitive, and he stands with the devil, at his side, as one of his chiefs, and there are those men who bow to the devil, and Kir should not be permitted to be of the soldiers of cities, for he does much evil there and he conceals great wrongs, and he keeps the soldiers from giving aid to the Lord's people, for he lies and disrupts and he seizes control of the entire group of soldiers with his lies, that he becomes their king without their knowing it, and he seizes control even of the soldiers of David, that he becomes king of a great portion of the nation, for he is for keeping aid to the Lord's people, and he is crafty in his lies, a fool of slander and lies, and he is a heavy sand hill that keeps away help, and he makes a curtain of sand that keeps help away from the Lord's people. Now what is Kir and Kursh, but Kir and Kursh is a people and a foolish people, and they then go against religion and atheism alike, and they are for a luke-warm and disgusting thing, that has not truth, and has much brutality and foolishness, for Kir and Kursh is comparable to the agnostic, who bullies and does not know, and who is unacceptable in their insolence and is not aware of it, for they do not keep to truth or take anything to truth.

Now the ignorant woman who is stubborn, she speaks of compassion as her cause, but it is only her cruelty for which she hates knowledge and learning, and holy things, for she is stubborn and cruel and greatly hating to be provoked to higher things. Now then she is a great and iniquitous shield for those who would be enlightened.

Now the king of Eretz Chadrack is its principles and laws, and the Lord who is God is king over him.

Now the INCEL are a foreign terrorist gang, for if they achieved what they wanted, the nation would collapse into ruin.

Now if they are normalizing as they fight people, and they are obstructing with meaningless arguments, indeed they are not complying and they are dismissing all inquiry. For such is an insolent act towards them who have the right to inquire, for they rebel against the inquiry. Now if they do so as a group to spread a kingdom of evil, indeed it is a spreading virus in society, and it devours civilization and brings it quickly to wickedness and evil, for it is a fast moving virus that takes land and spreads, for such is the work of terrorists who attack a nation, that this is a group of them who are dropped into a location and they spread out their evil and take more ground with brutal normalizing, and obstructing of arguments, and non-compliance with the reason and laws, for they are a brutal group that spreads without hearing rebuke, and they cast out the good quickly, and they spread with bullying and slander, and meaningless things they say in insolence, though they seem polite, for they are insolent, and they speak before others are able to speak what they would say, and it spreads and takes land, even land in far away places. Now they take a city, and they take two cities, and they spread into high places in government, and they move quickly, for they are a fast moving army, and they place their people in what places they can, and they spread and take ground, and the nation is brought to hell and to evil. Now then move quickly and remove them by force, for they will take much land.

Now the assumption is always that a person is not dung, for unless they are displaying much the things of dung, they are always assumed not to be dung, for it is not part of the people, but dung is what is below the Earth, for it is not on land, and is not considered, for you do not consider dung, as part of your spirituality, and you do not mention it, for it is as if not a thing at all, for the knowledge of it should not be among you. Now when it comes upon land, then is the knowledge among you, and it is odious, and a polite people speak not and wait for it to be removed. 

Now given the nation and the primitive fashion of it at the time during and after the spread of a virus, the sane and intelligent were lucky that they had not been killed, and brutally killed, for they had done nothing to the angel, really, given the circumstance and how many of them had gone insane, for much madness was upon them. Now in that time jealousy was a cause to attack the stranger who would never be dealt with in the future, or seen, for the people had become primitive, as if ignorant of words and learning, and the INCEL who promoted being primitive and fought for it, it was as if they were sane in comparison. Now such was the great disaster of Eretz Chadrack, that all the sane were being thrown out and bullied away with brutality and feigned stupidity, and the devil was overthrowing the nation, for the Earth was caving into pits in all places where water flowed and the rocks of Esua were, and grievances that did not take priority were being carried out by those who did not know that the nation would collapse. Now I considered, does the Lord make an example for the Earth, of this nation? But they are being destroyed without battle-bows and without violence, and the good are being cast out, and stubborn ignorance is ruling over them from high places. Now slaves were attacking the good, and the places of the noble were besieged, and many of the men who desire men had become aggressive in their lust, speaking cruelty from intense lust and they had swarmed about the beautiful men and sexually harassed in their great lust. Now these were the men who were keeping the war against the nation going, that it was collapsing, and they exploited the things of compassion that were for others of their type and not for them. 

Now with my knowledge I had known that Kir had been him who had been the most attacking Eretz Chadrack, for those he commanded, as their leader, these were all of the soldiers that were Kir's, for he had been the mighty fool of slander and evil who had waged the most war and kept the war going against Eretz Chadrack, and second was the shark Jews, the smaller sharks who belong below Ur, who carried out false-religious justice and were held blameless in that land because they seemed to have been Christians, or claiming the Bible. Now because of Kir and the shark Jews, there was much chaos, and Damascus, some of it, had become childish and wicked. Now were there not also foreign enemies stirring up trouble? Now then what was lacking that the people had begun to fight in this way? But give the shark Jews water, and the Ocean that is pleasant, and cease your harrassments, and the men of Kir, give them to the sword, for these were those who had preyed upon children, and there was no thing for them, for they had exploited the anarchy, and restore to the mountain tribes what was taken, and remove the horrible laws that had come, and remove the Assyrian device, for the people have democracy, and it is not required, for you are too lazy to deal with things in a way that costs less money, and apologize for the harassment, and rebuke the sociopaths who harassed the people, and encourage the give praise to the soldiers of cities, for they are not shown much gratitude, for I only give religion, and yet as leader I would encourage them and praise them, for they are deserving more praise. Now be then careful, as a person who is upon a place for great care, and so then when the people are safe, fight their enemies who are raising the cost of things against them, for they have come to the degree of war and they endanger the whole Earth, indeed all the people of Earth for they are able to bring the whole Earth to hell and ruin. Now then when all these things have been delt with, then you may consider, with peace, matters of becoming greatly advanced.

The dung of the sociopath has no understanding, less so than the sociopath, for they are the dung of a dog, the dung of a sociopath, what the sociopath rejected.

Now the dung of primitive people is all primitive people rejected, and the dung of mentally challenged people, all that they rejected.

Now Uriah is mighty in what does not belong in war, what is wicked and despicable.

Now sharks are beneficial when they keep to their realm, which is to be doing justice concerning those who prey on children, and those things that are really below Ur, and not that which has a slight flaw. Now then there is the sufficient flaw and the insufficient that you not consume those who are sufficiently righteous. Now then consume not the people, but those who are below Ur, these are in the shark Jews realm and the realm of the shark.

Now then it is not seeming that any would speak of dung in society, and yet like the anthropologist might, I have considered that it may be beneficial to some that I have studied and learned about such things.

Now the warm and flexible dung, it is seeming perverse in some way, and it offers sympathy at the wrong time and places because it is bullying, for warm and flexible it is.

Now was not Eretz Chadrack to be considered like-wise, that a young boy, a child, went out and built a canoe, and it was a very exceptional canoe, and the men said, without injustice in such a case, you did not build that canoe, and the women said, my husband can build a canoe, and the children said, why can't I build a canoe? Now some were filled with awe and wonder, for they were awaiting such things. Now then when such settles, then we can all use the canoe, I considered, and we will be a more united people. Now let the alligators be calm, and the more primitive not believe it is sorcery come to kill them, that they attack, and the wise men, let them be praised because they were wise. Now I call this the village land of Eretz Chadrack, for it is the correct way for the people to understand Eretz Chadrack. Now there are many villages, and there are primitive about in the wilderness. Now if the angel was not an angel, this would be the story of it. Now the canoe was exceptional, and a crazy, heathen woman, out of her mind, and from another place, had seemed to have been possessed by a demon, and foreign terrorists of some type had laid siege to the child's dwelling, and a known scum-bag had been possessed by a demon and he was a foreigner, and he had waged a siege against the child's dwelling, and the soldiers of cities had then been understood to be traitors in a specific village, for it could not be understood otherwise, for they covered up the matter and did not defend the child, and so it was clear that the child had been attacked by foreign enemies and traitors, and the child was a maker of things, and the things he made glorified the people of Eretz Chadrack, and was as a shining building that brought glory to the people, with a torch, and so it was understood he had been attacked by the disloyal, wicked traitors and foreign enemies, and it was even understood there was some measure of attack upon the nation from traitors and foreign enemies. Now then because of this, America, the farming people, would not be meddling to become involved, for they would only then be coming to the aid of their brother, being loyal to him and to aid him, for those in the governments of Eretz Chadrack were not the people of Eretz Chadrack, and it could be understood, for their words were only deceptions of a foreign enemy towards them, and the real people were still about. Now to invade would be the act of an allie, and not an invasion, for there was no border between Eretz Chadrack and America, by Mala. Now America was not the type not to hand back what they had seized in military victory, for they were a righteous people in this way, and Eretz Chadrack was as if their own people.

Now then the drive out the traitors and the foreign enemies, the people were required to remove them, for they were as midianites with foreign enemies and terrorists, people of corruption and crime and enemies to the nation, and yet they would have been wrong to do anything to the schools, for these were neutral, and yet they had seized hospitals and government agencies and they had seized groups of soldiers of cities, and all these had to be driven out, for they could not be allowed to remain, and yet the vast majority had not betrayed the nation. Now then the mountains and the mountain tribes were able to know who the traitors were, for they were rocks, and they detested mud and slime, and even David could not do it without their guidance and truth in this thing, and the soldiers of cities were being impaired always from removing the traitors, so that it was Cessus that was the only remaining thing capable in this thing, and so let them shut their ears, for they were being lied to with expert lying, for they would be right to shut their ears entirely and keep their eyes open, to know what people did and not what they were saying to them. Now then emergency laws were required to do this thing, that would be cast away later, for the corrupt were ruining the nation, and they were loyal to foreign enemies and hated the nation, and the brother of Eretz Chadrack was required, that the efforts of Eretz Chadrack not be scattered, for America was required for this thing. Now there was no real border between Eretz Chadrack and America, only formalities and securities, and it was as a brother not even that far away, who dwelt in another land, who knew the cousins of the house, who had been amongst them as children, and all of them together, who visited without ceremony, for he visited often. Now then the wicked were too brutal not to have their brother to aid in the fight, and all of the traitors could be cast out and removed, for America was a greater nation, and the vast majority of Eretz Chadrack had not betrayed the nation, and it was a thing America could do for Eretz Chadrack that Eretz Chadrack could not do for America, for America was very mighty, as a great King known about the whole Earth.


Now if you will not speak at a sentient level, of men and women, we will interpret you and declare to you your guilt or your righteousness, for if you will not be honest and speak at a sentient level, of men and women, of even children, you will be known to be a piece of dung, and we will interpret you, all those who are for sentience. Now those a traitor will be declared a traitor, at sentience, and those who go back and forth with things below sentience and foolishness to dismiss, that something may be cast away after it is dealt with by foolishness, it will not be cast away, and you will be known to be a piece of dung, and we will interpret you and declare your guilt for you, for cowardly and wicked we will not regard, that you are able to speak at a sentient level, to say yes or no, to be honest with the people, and honest where there are very weighty matters, and declare your reasons and your war. Now so there is the Assyrian device, and it is a very large thing that is turned against the people, cause for rebellion, and none will cast it away, and they may not deny it or they will not be regarded, for they will not be sentient and they must be, and there is corruption and it cannot be denied, and it facilitates foreign enemies and terrorists. Now then soldiers cannot fight the people in rebellion, for it is democracy, that if they will not do the will of the people in such a large thing that is forbidden by the Earth, that there are no leaders who will listen and take action, than it is democracy, and soldiers cannot fight the people when they are rebelling in the fashion of what is democracy, for people were refusing them democracy. Now to remove capacity can often be what is not part of torture, for it is not within the realm of torture, and it can often obtain the number of the beast, them who participate in it, for it is senseless and strange that any of them should do any good thing anymore, for there only hope is the victory of the devil, and he cannot prevail. Now if they do good things still, yet it is foolish for them, and without reason, for there is no hope for them anymore, those who have committed this wickedness beyond people, for those who refuse to do it, they are saving their own self from hell, for to take the number of the beast is not a thing of war, or even of torture, for it is a thing that can have no anger in it, for it is worship of the devil, and such it is, that there is no war to it, or anger to it, only it is considered torture because of lack of vocabulary. Now those who take the number, it is a thing of the lake of fire, and there is no war for the lake of fire, for they act with devil worship, for to harm true love is devil worship and gets the number of the beast, and it is not a thing of war, for it is without anger and cannot have anger, and it is a thing of devil worship, irrelevant to war or anger, that is in another category from war, for it is another topic, and another thing, a calm thing of devil worship, in reverence to the devil. Now to remove capacity in some cases, in what occurs, it is not a thing of war, but it is a thing of devil worship and reverence to the devil, and there is no anger in it. Now them who commit this devil worship to do reverence to the devil, they are having no hope anymore for it is a thing beyond a nation, and the soldier may not fight for it, for he will take the lake of fire to him, for he will be consumed with the lake of fire. Now so there are devil worshippers in the world, and there is no hope for them anymore, and there is no reason for them to do anymore good things, for they are having only reason to do obedience to the devil. Now they cannot be brought back, and they are as mud and slime, and the lake of fire, and the pit is for them, where they will suffer in great pain, pain to madness, for the lake of fire burns bright as the sun, and they will be insane with pain. Now so they will become as the lake of fire, in their spirits, becoming pure pain and agony, and suffering as the angels look on.

Now be always remembering that if a person already has the number of the beast, they are as a demon on land, and their good is only deception. Now if they seem like a person, yet they are not, and they are an old man, a demon, and they are loyal to wickedness and the will of the devil, for they have no real interest in any good thing, for they are not ignorant. 

Now the vast majority, greatly overwhelming, they were good still in having all chance of Heaven, for they had not exceeded in steps, the boundaries of the wicked, to step further and fall into hell, for they were a vast people in comparison to a small skirmish and the skirmish was the devil's people, that the war was between Eretz Chadrack and the devil's people, for they were devil worshippers that they fought, for they had fallen into hell long prior, and taken the number of the beast, many of them, and they were the war to be fought after the great war, for the devil had launched his own war, and his people were upon land as a skirmish, and they greatly hated the land of Eretz Chadrack, for they were even in government and they sought to destroy the land of Eretz Chadrack. 

Now the dung that is water, essentially, is moving past all truth that is implied, believing in weakness where there cannot be any, bypassing the language, having an argument where there can be no argument anymore, at least not as they make it, for they have not the integrity of firm dung, and they are the most water type of diarrhea, and the less water type of diarrhea, is almost as them, although the most water type is believed to be a pedophile.

Now monster dung has said, you are beautiful and so stupid, for there is some thing of beauty to you, and it has said, you are without wickedness, for you are young to be without wickedness, a child, and they are monster dung, and you are foolish to be daring, for you tread in places where there is monster dung, and so your fate is what it is, for your imprudence and your foolishness, for the threat made is great, for from the sewage places it comes forth, declaring, fool!

Now if any is the most wicked people who ever lived, being a piece of dung, to pretend to have remorse and sympathy, does not make them better, but worse, for a person, Jews, men and women, have their integrity.

Now if a portion of the zefar departed to become philistines, to worship the devil, saying, none will do business with me, and none will help me to become wealthy, for I am not meant to be with the people, indeed they were not meant to be with Beelzebub who took them in when they were lost, for they have betrayed the zefar, and Dagon is furious with them, for they are extreme terrorists, worse than any group of terrorists, and they commit wickedness and do not know how wicked they are, for they have departed from Dagon, from the Lord also, and they have been taken in by Beelzebub, and so let David spare none of them, for they are traitors to us.


Now then when there is a massive, even epic, sewage problem for an area of a nation, it is embarrassing, and the loyal might lessen the accuracy of the report for other nations, so as not to embarrass the nation, for if there is an epic sewage problem for a large area, it is not even terrorism, but it is worse than terrorism, and there is little purpose, except for the purpose of later science, in analyzing all the things that are found in the sewage, for it is all flexible sewage, flexible enough to pretend to be stupid even with the very simple truths of a thing, for only dung is flexible enough in such situations where the truth is very simple, that is can thread a small gap that not even an insect can pass through with its flexibility in pretending to be stupid with things of simple truth, and so if the soldiers of cities had become all sewage and dung, worse than pedophiles in their lack of integrity, and the people in government had become dung, and there was dung and sewage rising up, it would be the worst thing that has ever happened to any nation in history, and there is no purpose in asking why this has happened to a nation, only it must be dealt with by the military, and labelled terrorism, though it is not terrorism, and called organized, though it is not organized, or may not be, for in that time there may even be sewage coming out of pipes that has to be ignored, and it is a disgusting thing, and not all is spoken of, and so another nation might be asked for aid, and the soldiers must be called to shovel, and there will be refugees in that time, fleeing their own nation, for the sewage uprising is epic and horrible. Now it is not reported, and they do not say, and so it is almost treacherous that they have not even given support to their own people during the rising of sewage in their nation. Now where this happened, I will not say.

The lack of intelligence that is not even able to name-call to something a person is not, but is in closer proximity to what a person is, calling a name that is seeming random and even the opposite, this is a greater lack of intelligence that is very far from average intelligence. Now when it is found with arrogance, even less intelligence.

Now because of lack of knowledge, they believed there was such thing as mental illness, and with greater knowledge, there is only being mentally challenged and impairments of this type, for what is mental illness is only a person having time in a temporary thing, and the idea of mental illness is only cover often for abuse and things that have occurred. Now then if some of the mentally challenged are not as easily able to deal with changes, such is what occurs. Now with greater knowledge, coming later, it is understood there is no mental illness. Now then if they are eating when they should eat, drinking what they should drink, and there is no absurd or wrong thing occurring, then leave the person alone that they may return to you, for do not be a foolish people in this thing.

Now if any is dung, they are not mentally ill, and it is not a thing of being mentally challenged, or any thing other than being dung.

Now the belief in mental illness, it was the belief of the INCEL even before the INCEL had become more organized, for they were always organized as unjust and abusive men, and even some women with them, that the belief in mental illness, it is the continuation of a primary thing of the INCEL.

Now because there is wickedness coming from the mentally challenged who are having the temporary things of mental illness, that they are not the same as those who are not mentally challenged when they are having the temporary things in which they should be left alone, if wanted, they were causing problems for those with mental illness. Now not all those mentally challenged were committing wickedness, either, and there were those being abused, who were given no choice but to defend themselves. Now most of the mentally challenged were not committing wickedness, and so it was the dung that was doing so, and the reasons were not mental illness or being mentally challenged, but it was because some of them were dung when they were not defending themselves. Now does a person allow a dangerous beast to attack, or if it is known to be dangerous, is it not dealt with and removed from people? Now do you not remove the dangerous dog? Do you not remove those things that are dung from you? Now those who give drugs make the mentally ill so that they will be again. Now the Priest of wellness will only be for the voluntary in the future who desire for assistance with their spirituality, or life, and they will also be for recreation.

Now mental illness is a thing of the INCEL, for they say, they are sick, when they are only abused by some type of abuse, but men are able to know the wickedness of the wicked.

Now there have been found those who stand at the right or left of the devil, and those who bow to the devil, and those standing at his side, many have been found as soldiers of cities, for they are being more effective for the devil in this place.

Now the mentally ill who are not mentally challenged, they cannot be considered dangerous to themselves or to others, and most of the mentally challenged cannot, for these are temporary things that are things of people. Now the lack of intelligence of the dangerous, the foolishness of it, it is only the wickedness of them taking them to wickedness, for these are those who have great motive in their heart to perform wickedness, for they are found with much iniquity.

Now was it not everything but religion that was the problem, for that which was not religion, it was causing what they considered to be insanity. Now it made violence in the world, what was not religion, and it provoked conflict and rage within, and it caused chaos and the conviction in wickedness to continue with wickedness, for where there had prior been apathy and peace, there was conflict and wars happening. Now by hope that is vague, without understanding, there was murder and wars carried out because of what must be dealt with by a person on their own, for they acted externally what must be dealt with on their own. Now men had driven out their jealousy by insolence and made themselves slaves, and it was not good, and there were those who went in the opposite direction of wisdom in their seeking of wisdom.

Now pretending to be some known type of person of another people, and not what you are when with another people, it is being a piece of dung, but integrity of truth, it respects society.

Now there was the great crises, which was not great to me, except great, where a nation dealt with that which was in government, the toilet bowl, and the dung would not flush, for it was stubborn, and the dung did not seem to know why it was fighting for something, and there was not really a problem with the toilet, and so they wondered if the military was required to flush the dung, for the dung was in many places in government and places it should not be, and it was stubborn and fighting, and it was having the great motive in the human profile, which is the motive of projection, for it can be the greatest motive of a person, and it did not seem to know why it was fighting or even what it was fighting for, and the nation did not want to give news of it to the rest of the Earth, and yet perhaps the military was required, for the dung was stubborn, and would not flush. Now it was considered, perhaps the dung should be broken up, that it will flush, and yet who but the military could do this thing? Now were the people not capable adults that they could not do what the military could do? But it was a large toilet, the toilet bowl of government, for so it had become, and it was fighting for the concept of incapacity and other things that did not make sense to fight for against their own people. Now it was a fight within a person's own house against its own residents, and so was the war, the war of a nation. Now add to it the sewage problem with a portion of the soldiers of the cities, and the nation was becoming ill even, and there was cause for much bitterness.

Now Sasquatch is a natural brute beast, for animals have sense of respect of society, and of sentience, and Sasquatch attacks innocence with the attack to kill, for it is like no animal, for is does the opposite of what it just, going beyond condemning righteousness, but attacking innocence and what is good and blameless, for it is a killing beast, that kills where it can, and it take the number of the beast and does not know, for it goes beyond the limits of war, even the limits of torture, for it attacks what is innocent and blameless, bludgeoning or attacking with sharpness, with viscous condemnation. Now it is a natural brute beast and it regards nothing, not kings, not great things, not great innocence, nothing it regards, and it attacks what no soldier would attack, what no man or woman would attack, for that which deserves praise it attacks as if evil, for it is a thing for killing. Now it does not exist in nature, for the animals will not tolerate it. But it exists, and it is found in the land of Eretz Chadrack as well, and it is understood that if any kills a Sasquatch what happens in the forest should remain there, for they are considered blameless for it, but they should not tell any person they have killed a Sasquatch.

Now reality is not a boundary for dung and dung has no integrity. Now there is the dung that is thought to be stones, or even Damascus, and yet it is dung. Now then do not trust pale dung, you who believe them to be stones, for they will be found to be a piece of dung. Now if pale dung is found among stones, yet it is dung and is not like the stones. Now have the stones really liked the pale dung? Now there are dung mountains, and they are not kings.

No dung has fought for the idea of incapacity, without seeming to know why it fights, and it is dung that lacks capacity, for dung is not able to appreciate the consequences and does not know why it fights, and the idea, the concept, does not belong in society, for the concept is dung itself, for it is flexible and goes in many directions.

Now the foreign enemy has said, place the witch-hunt in their society, for the people will ignore it who are people, doing little, and the dung will seize upon it, and it will be like a virus, for the most exceptional will be the target of these attacks. So is the open gate, that the most exceptional will be attacked because of it. So too, is the concept of incapacity at times. Now it is more the weapon of the INCEL, and it is to attack those who have been victims, for it is also the weapon of the people who are dung, and the weapon of the League of unjust men, who are committing wickedness by the authority of being men, and not for any reason against wickedness. Now it will not harm the angel, or do a thing to him, and many it will do nothing to, and yet there are those to whom it is a thing of torture, that is not within the realm of torture, for it exceeds the limits of respect of boundaries and takes the number of the beast. Now just because people are dung, let the people understand, it does not mean they are pedophiles if they are believed to be. Now the pedophile is the water diarrhea with many.

Now there is the dung of a terrorist, for it feels only slightly offended, and it is doing all the things, and attacking, and in a way that it is all the terrorists rejected, that they would never do, that they would never attack, and it attacks much, being a piece of dung, doing that which the terrorists rejected.

Now in a place that is operating by the morality of prison, will a spiritual person not hear the balls of a pedophile that is melded with dung? Now the two things have become as one.

Now the wicked should have no hope in their lack of intelligence, and yet great hope some of them have, and they are a beast of enormous and frighteningly large balls, and no head.

Now sexual harassment, it is so when a person is not doing what they are being called, for then it is sexual harassment, for there is no cause or reason for it, and it is either sexual harassment, or is combat strategy in a war zone, that next the attack will come with violence, for the soldiers endure much brutality as they fight.

Now lack of strategy occurred, for the soldiers of cities declared, you shall not bury the dung in your own environments where you are having to deal with it, for the soldiers of cities are those who do all care for the environment, that you may not care for the environment without special permission and much learning, and so the soldiers of cities did not care for the environment, and the people were not permitted to clean their own environment of dung and trash, and the trash and dung caused many to die, because the people were not permitted to clean their environment, and because the soldiers of cities were apathetic to cleaning the environment, and this, too, was part of the crises of a nation. Now was it because trash and dung lied and said, we clean the environment like they do to us?

Now for a rabid bear, are you not cautious? But the bear might only be sick temporarily, and a Babylonian Princess, does she not dance before some? Now it is the sickness of Rome, for she is hosted within the spirit of a male. Now what does a good people say? But ask me for what you like? She will say, give me the Lord of a people, for he is great, and it is a pleasing thing she asks for, and good.

The clouds of Ariel, the entertainments of the clouds, these all have lied, and lied about the past, and lied about people. Now what every cause was, it was common sense, and is common sense, and yet it is become a thing of politics by the clouds, and so the existence of people can be challenged, and there was only the abject who were a problem prior, who will not listen again, and they come forth with every generation, and the entertainments of the clouds, and the clouds of Ariel, they are the great machine of arguments and contentions, and the causes were all accepted, common sense, and so the world become worse when they say it becomes better, and what was worse, it was worse for a time, and the clouds did not change those things much, for they are clouds, and so then the abject are the eternal problem, and they are dealt with in their time, and so it continues, and so then there are those who do not look to the clouds to know the world, but they look to the world. 

Now people are what they do, and they do what they are, and the consistency of things is showing them to be what they are. Now when wisdom is given the tide washes upon the beach and it returns to the Ocean.

Now the problems of Eretz Chadrack were as: piece of dung, sewage problem, primitive gangs, primitive, and that which was not a problem was as people of many kings, jewels of kings, people of integrity, people of a clean and beautiful land, wise villages, people of truth who love truth and are not offended by it.

Now the blind stone targeted the wrong things with its mouth, but stones are having good vision most often.

Now the female Pharisee was as the male Pharisee, and both were men who were Pharisees, and they were not sincere, but they were sincere for an ideology of being foolish and ignorant, and they opposed the sons of God among the people, not being the fullness of the son of God, but the sons of God at a level, and the angels of that level were men, some of them, and even angels? For the angels at that level were men and angels, and both were the angels to defend against the Pharisees, for the people not offended by truth, given good by truth and safety, did not the speakers of truth not know they were not offended? But still the Pharisees were zealous for some ideology of foolishness and ignorance, and they were not people offended, or like people sincerely offended, who there might be time for, but they were as those knowing and being zealous for an ideology, having no place in anything and opposing good, for they did not belong in anything and they were like viper's poison, like bread of sin, like philistines who had converted to devil worship, having betrayed Dagon that he would like for David to wipe them out, and they were like soldiers for a thing, and not like people, like citizens in society who might be offended for whom there would be time and patience in discussion. So Dagon has said, the son of God was greater than me, indeed much greater, for the demons do no obey the rebuke or command of Dagon, and yet Dagon has been a son of God at a much lesser level, that men have been as angels to him and angels, also. Now the son of God was great to be giving mercy almost, where Dagon would have heavy combat and war. Now the son of God has fulfilled all, the Christ, and He was prophet, Elijah, Moses, having all ability, even to prophecy, wisdom, and obedience, indeed, fulfilling all.

Now men and women are equal, of equal height, and they are very different from each other, and what is great wickedness for a man is not so for a woman, and what is great wickedness for a woman is not so for a man. Now when the two are joined, they are as one. Now who makes trouble for them? But is it not a brutal thing, and a wicked and brutal thing, even arrogant, with great arrogance, to be making brutal trouble for the man and woman who are together? Now even a spirit of a Pharisee has been making trouble for them, and it is a disgusting thing to make trouble for them, not part of war. 

Now the things called feminism is what men believed, and they had believed these things primarily, as the primary people of these beliefs, and women believed these things less, and still do, and the prostitute who is a bully, she is still only a bully, and horrible, for she attacks what is good for women, the goodness that would have been, for she is actually a weapon of what they call misogyny, fighting for misogyny towards women, and the female misogynist, she has even been Sasquatch at a further developed level, and imposter, false-wife, in other cases, for if she says, I am equal, she is an imposter wife and it is sign of divorce where there was no marriage, for she hates women, and yet the woman who says I am equal, she is not wrong to say so, for the the man must have wisdom to do some things, and even further he must go not to offend the wife of his youth, who has a special place, the palace even that is hers, and maidens she has, and many great things built to her at her palace, for she is called wife of his youth, whether young or not, whether met in youth or not. Now she is right to say what she says, and in other cases, right to say even more, and is she not greater than him in many things, for the man is not greater in all things than the wife, for if she excels in good things of God, and good virtues of Him, indeed she is greater than the man in many things. Now against, the problem is only the abject types, who would not listen before, and will not listen no matter what effort is made upon all the people, for it only causes evil for the people, and the abject do not listen with each generation. Now it only causes more to hate and to become what the message was against, and the abject, they do not listen and they are brought forth with each generation. Now then if the abject are not listening, than why cause discord that happens over time? For what is good that you would achieve, more of the opposite is achieved among the people. Now is this a thing of the cold war that occurred, that they have sown people against people, against humanity and things not a problem, for the people fight each other, the good fighting the good, and the problem was only the abject types, for all things were common sense. Now then the studies of women that are mostly for women, they are the best that was offered to fulfill another thing that was required for them, and some did not need it.

Now the person with self-esteem issues, yet they do not mean to bully, and a king is able to be great concerning them, and yet let their ears not be where they should not be if they have self-esteem issues, for there are those who must consider this thing.

Now for a man who is already a man, when he crushes dung with his foot, it flies about much and tries to confuse what cannot be confused, what cannot be confused for a man. Now the angel does an embarrassing thing, for he teaches men to fight, men who were already men, to fight dung better. Now the dung is all gathered, and it is gathered into a grotesque thing, like a hill, a monster, and the monster of dung, it goes about with the devil, for the monster of dung, it is the devil's unholy beast.

Now then excise the dung that is stubborn, for it makes the country so that it is dying, and people are dying because of the stubborn dung, the sewage problem, that is sometimes in government. Now it fights when it does not know why it fights, for it is stubborn dung, and extremely stubborn is some dung to flush, for it refuses, and so the dung must only be flushed and often with force, for the soldiers of the cities, they were not flushing the dung, and this was mostly the problem, and the soldiers of cities they were not able to flush the dung for people were keeping them from it. Now to not be flushing dung is to be hating your nation, for it is the thing of a person who hates the people, the nation, to not flush dung, for he or she hates the people, and it is treachery, whether compassionate or not, for why will you have compassion when it is dung? Now your Emperor, Nye Baker, who studies this thing, whether it is embarrassing or not, has said that it is so.

Now then the methane fissure of volcanic land, it is worse than dung, and it is Edom, a thing of Edom. Now then keep away from it, for it is a rare thing and evil.

Now then what is Edom? But it is poisonous vapours, gases that are poison, and the land is volcanic land. Now evil is Edom, and even dangerous, and it is that which people should stay away from, for wisdom is given in this thing.

Now then keep yourselves clean from Edom, for the Hebrew Jews keep themselves clean from it, and though the Christians are very resilient to many things, being a more resilient people to things that are evil, yet it is still not good for Christians to not be keeping themselves clean of Edom. Now then think, yet God does not judge, and yet neither can people judge this thing, but still there is that which is not benificial. Now then for the philistines, also, keep yourselves clean from Edom if you can. Now if the Christian says, yet I am immune to all poison, yet it is true, but is it beneficial?

Now then empty yourselves of what comes from the colon, and do so in private, for so it is acceptable, and yet them who empty themselves in public, they are the homeless drunkards, and the noble are walking the streets. Now do not cackle with what comes from the colon, for it is not good. Now then the Edomites do not know. 

Now then if any is poisoned by a place, because of the place being Edom and there being Edomites, God is not a fool, for think he blames? But the Jews must keep their boundaries on land, and in many ways, and the Christians, immune to poison, innocent as doves, they are still doing well to be keeping themselves clean of Edom. Now then keep from Edom, for these are wicked lands, and there is much evil. Now then say not Asherah, for it is Edom, but rather use the words I have given, and cleaner words if you think it right, for you know what is clean. Now though a prince of Saturn may say some things, yet are you a prince of Saturn, that it is clean? Now a prince of Saturn is being kind, and yet are you being kind? Now then a Jew cannot mingle philistine and Jew, for so have the Orthodox committed without meaning to, mingling philistine with Jew, and they are good people, attempting to obey, and Solomon also mingled philistine and Jew in his older age, honouring the angel Baal, for he was still a fool, as wise men are always fools, and the angel is a fool as well, and even though likely well meaning, for with love for his wife, that is not my business, he wanted to honour Baal, an angel, him being a fool, a wise man, yet it was not clean, for he was a Jew, and the Orthodox Jews, they are placing things in wrong places at times, without meaning to, being poisoned by things of the philistines, for to them it is poison, and the fire of the philistines is holy, and it is holy fire to them, and good, and yet it is poison to Jews, for it burns the Jew like what is called Napalm, and though they have a heavy cloak, yet it cannot last them, and Solomon mingled philistine and Jew, likely to burn incense, for why would any sacrifice large things to an angel, and though the Japanese will burn incense to an angel, if they do, yet do the philistines do this? Now then it does not please Dagon that the philistines, the zefar, use cannabis to him, and yet burning resin for the good scent, or placing a small thing, a rabbit perhaps already slain, into a large fire, that is large, this is giving honour if it sends up a good scent, and yet it will defile the Jew, for they are the Lord's inheritance, and Zion Jews, the Lord's people, and the Lord's people do not sacrifice, for they are Jews by the Christ, but acceptance of Him as Lord. Now though Dagon is god of the philistine, the zefar, yet he is servant to the Lord, and while on Earth, too, servant to God, servant to the Christ. Now then the house of Anothoth, there are not many women who attain this, for it is a fulfillment of many things, and more than statues these women have, those women who are Anothoths. Now Lashich has remained silent when there was evil, for she was not for defending and doing good, for her heart hated, and yet Leah, she was having other concerns, for Leah is a thing of Anothoth, and Anothoth was faithful, being beautiful, for the beauty of Anothoth, it is as the wife of an angel. Now capture not the wife of a king, or the wife of an angel, because they have not come to Earth yet to know of their wife, or because they have not known yet of the woman, and the INCEL has hated kings and angels, both of them, and said, let captured women who survived in troubled and evil times, let them remain captured and even be punished, because they are more holy women, for let them not commit adultery, they say, as the devil in their own mouths, and yet it is not for men, for these men who have captured, they are injured by her, for they were forbidden to have her, as John the Baptist had said, and they were ignorant of his words, for he was greater than any man who had been born of woman, and the men who capture these women, they are injured by her, for though they do not commit adultery, yet they are not right to have her, and yet she has been forced to survive, for it was an evil time, and a troubled time, and she was in an enemy land, worse than an alien in that land, for the kings had not ever come to her, and the angels had not been known in that land, and so the man who has captured her by marrying her forces her to commit adultery, and there is no real love there, or meaningful love, and not even approaching what is true love, that is the wife of youth. Now then John the Baptist knew this thing, and he was Elijah, and greater than him was the Christ, and the Romans were not a good people, for they did not understand, and the woman was wicked, for she hated her husband who had not come, for she was ignorant and stubborn this woman, and this was her manner of ignorance, for if she had not become ignorant and stubborn, to force herself to love where there was no love, yet she would have not been bullied by this man who she married, and she accepted the evil as good, and said, I do good, and she did wickedness because of it, not knowing how wicked she had become, for she had become ignorant and stubborn, not knowing her own actions anymore, how disgusting and wicked they had become. Now she had garbed herself in darkness, because her husband had not come, and yet the woman who trusts God, who remains in truth, she will not be blinded in this way, not by anything even that the angel has not given as wisdom. Now John the Baptist, he gave the advice of a loyal friend to the ruler, and he could not have loved the woman with true love, for there is wisdom to know concerning it, that he could not have loved her much. Now better for her to have committed adultery then. Now her, will her husband blame her, the king or the angel, who has not ever been known of to her? But after she has known of him, after he has come, then there is guilt for the thing, and God is able to judge the Earth. Now then is it not also the case, that she had not loved her husband at all who had married her, who he was not permitted to have, and so she asked her daughter from fear? Now it was not required, and believe she that it would please the husband who had married her? Now what type of people is this? But formal to the degree of wickedness? Now were they mindless, without understanding, and being mindless in their formality of things that such a thing could not be accomplished when there was a misunderstanding? Now this is not a good people, but a people who are wicked, and without understanding, and even mentally unwell, being a mentally ill people. Now believe any that other people not Jews were as the Romans? But other people were not as them, and void of understanding were these people, having foolish ways, foolish beliefs concerning understanding and wisdom, a useless and incompetent people, having only survived Hannibal by the general's choice that they should remain. Now these were a foolish people who prospered, a mentally ill people who did not care for justice or care about keeping themselves clean, and Edomites were many of these people, poisonous gases, foul and odious, repulsive to people who are people, worse than dung. Now is it not so that some of them were only poisoned by Edom, for even Christians are poisoned by Edom at times, and they are immune to the poison, and there are even Hebrew Jews who are immune to some poisons, and yet they are a people who take precautions to keep themselves clean, for they are not as resilient as Christians to poisons. Now the common affliction, it is not being mentally unwell, that you not blaspheme, but it is the common affliction, and the angel knows that it is the common affliction for all people. Now the Romans had not the common affliction. Now what occurred? But dung and poison had been spread over Israel, the Hebrew Jews, for other people were not as Romans who were not Jews, and in that time there was also the fools made of viper's venom and poison, the Pharisees, attempting to cause people to commit errors of speech, placing questions to them that answering would make them look bad, and would be wickedness in their mouth by the answer, and these fools pestered the Christ while He was on Earth, and poison, it is worse than dung, and dung is poisonous. Now the Roman women, many of them were holy, for they did not like the things that were wicked that their people did. Now had the Roman women become Jews upon the Jews becoming part of Rome in a way? But did polite not have the power to crucify the Christ? Now the dung that rises up over what is greater, it should be crucified? But them who persecute what is greater, who are dung to place themselves where no person of integrity can be? Now then do not consider the rising up over, but only what is dung, and what is wrong, for if any is a piece of dung, then they should be buried, should they not? Now how will you know what is greater and what is worse, only what is being wicked you know. Now then who gave the Christ over to be crucified? But it was Uriah who did this thing, and Uriah washed his hands of it, and said, I am not guilty. For polite was Uriah.

Now by self-experience belief, that is because of lack of understanding as part of human ability, there is a person who has not understood that there are others who consider people and experiences and things that are not like themselves and that they sincerely are angry and considerate, and many things, on behalf of these people. Now self-experience belief is a mild impairment that a person should rid themselves of.

Now people are so mostly by nature, that most of a person is nature with concerns to what is politeness and right, for morality is nature, and it is so by nature, that the atheists look to nature as having made people and there is what is morality by being social or anti-social, for it is morality, and they name morality as being morality, and nature is God to them, for it is their creator, and they do not worship nature, for so is science kept without religion, that it not be made evil by the spirit of the day that might seize it with some wrong zeal to bring about evil, for neutrality is obtained by being atheistic. Now then atheists advocate that Babel not become religious, and it is considered good for it keeps it safe and keeps the lands of the Earth safe from it. Now where it has been coerced, do they not consider, it is something not likely of atheists that has coerced it to something evil, for it is not remaining in morality of truth and is converted to some agenda of the spirit of the day, or some prior day. Now the angel does not disagree with them, for he does not blame atheists for anything concerning any wrong that has come from Babel, but he too considers, it was the spirit of some prior day, religious in some way, and yet not of the religion followed by the moral, but a sickness of religion, for there are many sick branches that are departing and forming sick and evil trees, and these are other trees in the realm of religion, and some of these trees are evil, and secretly they persecute the moral trees that are religious, and they are zealous trees, daring against morality, and they are zealous for their evil, and they would indeed corrupt Babel and would dare this as much as they could, and as for discord sowing, this too they would dare, as all evil zealots are daring when they can manage it. Now then the communists, religious in a fashion, for they have the ideology as their religion and atheism does not concern them, for is not a concern, these are sowing discord and they are arrogant, chickens, peeking and viscous, worthy to be consumed as a meal, filthy and rebellious, to be consumed by the other animals, for these are not concerned for atheism, and atheism is not their goal, for these are hateful, rebellious against most things as their oppressor, as they call it, and they are sowing discord, for they do not confess what they are, and they have taken it upon themselves to be as spies and agents for this goal, and zealous religious have also taken to acting and sowing discord, and it is not only enemies of the nation, but enemies of the Earth entire, as the INCEL, too, are enemies of the Earth, and all reason and good, for they are an evil branch of primitive, for they are a war against primitive people, being primitive, and to animals they wish to go, saying, let us not become people, but let us become animals and be animals, for we are animals and we go in the way of animals, and those who are people, they are our oppressors, for the people, they are our oppressors, and to animals we go, and we will fight people, for there is the Christ canopy that we hate, for it has not forbidden, though the evil zeolots came forth, and they would have found some other way to come forth without religion of this type, and ideology they would have chosen, and the beauty canopy, the canopy of Dagon, the canopy of the philistines, who will be called the zefar, this too we hate, for it is the other canopy of the people, for they have the Christ canopy and the Dagon canopy, the beauty canopy, and we attack the canopy, for the ground will collapse, and the Earth will become a pit, and hell will develop in the pit, and the whole of the Earth will be hell and Edom will come forth, and we will be animals, and we will die, every person will die in misery, converting to animals, and wickedness and evil will prevail, for so is the heart of the INCEL, for hidden is their wickedness, for misanthropy they have, and hatred of the world. Now then keep the Christ canopy, for the true canopy forbid no person from doing what pleased them whether good or bad, and keep the Dagon canopy, for it preserves the Earth from becoming a pit of hell, for it with-holds the great flood of Noah, for the devil desires it to flood the Earth and bring it to hell, for though God fights against the flood, the devil wishes to bring it. Now then keep every canopy, for the Rainbow is the sign of every canopy that is good that should remain that a flood not happen and bring the Earth to hell. Now the INCEL, they are anti-Christs, and the anti-Christ group, and yet there are many things that are anti-human.

Now in Noah's time the Earth had already been destroyed and was made hell, and God saved Noah and his family and the canopies were placed in the atmosphere. Now the beautiful are a canopy, and they prevent the pit that becomes hell, for it becomes Edom, and a pit of Edom. Now the wisdom of men and women, it is the rain falling upon the land. Now the work of artists, it is silver and gold, for it is not a thing of people trading cattle, for it is an advanced society. Now then be then advanced for the fourth day, for the animals wish to destroy the Earth by a great flood, and they can only be ignored, for God sent a flood when the Earth was destroyed, and the devil desires a flood to wipe out what is becoming advanced. Now have not the devil worshippers come from the efforts of a foreign nation? Now have not the INCEL also been supported by a foreign nation to attack a nation? Now there are two terrorists causes not for destruction, and they are neo-nazis and Islamic terrorism, for these two are ideological, and so is the case of America and Eretz Chadrack, for neither of these are for destruction, and yet there are the branches of Islamic terrorism that are for destruction. Now many of the terrorist gangs, they are only for the ruin of a nation. Now this is not the same as terrorism for most terrorism of a people's own nation, it is really foreign terrorism and the actions of foreign enemies. Now then the canopies of the atmosphere, they must remain, each of them, for to remove any canopy will be the ruin of a nation, and the word, the Christ canopy, he was already a canopy of the Earth prior to His coming, and being articulated, He is remaining, for He is articulated by His having come to Earth. Now He is truth, a canopy, and He is the truth, and even the word of the Lord, and all truth He is, all that is true, and He has been articulated, and the truth is not owned by the Hebrew Jews because the Lord chose a people early. Now the truth is the son of God, and the son of God, He is all truth, and He has been articulated, for though the atheists might say, He is truth articulated in scripture, in writing, yet the Christians say, there is a creator, and He is His son who has come to Earth and fulfilled. Now there are those things given to the Jews, that they may be clean, and these are things of people, and the Christians are another thing brought forth. Now when a Hebrew Jew says, I have the scripture as my Lord, they are having the word as their Lord, and He is the canopy. Now primarily the Christ was killed by the Pharisees, and they were offspring of the devil, and they were also enemies of the Jews, those who had the scripture as their Lord, and the Pharisees did not have the scripture as their Lord, and nor were they like Moses or Elijah, or those who follow in such a way. Now David came as a combat soldier, and he killed Uriah, for mighty and wicked is Uriah, the most wicked and evil soldier, and his combat does not belong in war, for it is not things of honour, but wicked are his ways, unworthy of an army, and David killed him by the vigilante, and yet the Christ was killed by Uriah and the Pharisees, and Uriah handed the Christ over to brutal and primitive people who were a gang that was separate from the people, and he washed his hands, as if he could wash his hands of it, for already he had washed his hands of it, for he washed his hands with a clear conscience in this thing, now having done great wickedness, it should not be, for he washed his hands of the wickedness of killing a blameless person, and only God is blameless, for the Lord finds fault even with the angels. Now so his wife dreams a dream, for blameless she is. Now the Christ was not killed, but he lived, for He was alive on the third day. 

Now dung comes from the mouth of dung when it is stepped on, and dung comes to confuse what cannot be confused when it is stepped on, for dung flies about when it is stepped on. Now integrity comes from the mouth of that which has integrity, whether it is considered good or evil.

Now then the Christ canopy is all that is true, and the truth about people, and it is the integrity of the people, the beauty canopy, it is the beautiful and those who are being beautiful. Now do not remove the canopy of justice, or attack it, for by the loss of any canopy the nation is brought to ruin. Now this is the powerful weapon of nation hacking, and it is the hacking of the nation, cutting things away, and it causes collapse and ruin, and there are holes within democracy for foreign agents to attack, and these are the open gates, that they might attack the people, and there is the corruption that can be bought against people, for foreign enemies might buy corruption, and a nation that accepts bribes, the bribes might buy the attacks upon the people. Now there are all the open gates against the nation, and the nation has many open gates, and the soldiers of cities must be diligent, for if they are apathetic, the nation can be destroyed easily, but where the soldiers of cities are diligent, then the dung is flushed away, and the people are being saved always, and the open gates are useless, for those who go through these gates, they are flushed away as the dung is flushed away, for they are flushed as dung. Now then make the core of the nation strong in protecting the people, and if the gates are left open, if they must be if the nation is great, then be considering, dung is terrorists, and corruption and bribes is terrorists, and apathy to save the people by the soldiers of cities, it is terrorists, and all evil that must be addressed, it is all terrorists. Now by this means, the nation is being kept, for when the soldiers of cities are diligent, then the nation is saved, and even the open gates can be better guarded, and where there are open gates to allow enemies to attack the people, these things might be watched more closely. Now then the soldiers of cities cannot be apathetic, for they must increase their diligence when there is an attack through the open gates and by the borders where people come in, and there are traitors and many things already in a nation, and treason is encouraged by a foreign nation, and discord is sown, and they do not rely upon the clouds, but upon their actions in a nation. Now it is disrespectful to honour the wicked and the wrong, and it is respectful to correctly label the wicked and the wrong, that to speak of them correctly is respectful, for this is the most respectful thing. Now your respect is for the righteous, for the good, all good things, and for God. Now dung says of dung, they are not respectful who speak truth, and dung says of itself, truth is disrespect if such is spoken about me, for dung is dung. Now the dung device, it is the rising up of dung when there is a flush, that instead of flushing, the dung rises up and is disgusting, and dung is used, for truth and peace is offensive to dung, for the dung will not flush, when there was nothing of offence spoken, no thing that would be wrong to say, that would be disrespectful. Now dung I have learned about, for the people must know of dung, for it belongs underground, but it has come up to land and it has roamed the Earth, and it is not good, and so it all must be flushed, and Edom people must know of, for it too can come up to Earth. Now if the clouds do not bring truth, they are bad clouds that rain acid and poison, for they rain pollution.

Now where there are people not able to control themselves, to remain in self-control concerning wickedness and morality, to not do evil, these must move back when there is a better thing than them, for if a better thing is coming to places nearby, they must move back if they cannot control when there is no wickedness from this better thing, for if they are petty and not keeping to morality, yet they must move back by what measure they must move back, until there is no longer the driving thing that brings evil from them, for they must not even look upon some, them who cannot keep themselves with integrity, and they must not hear about some, and they must not live in the area of some, and they must not live in a city that is the other city from some, and they must not live in a nation that is the same nation as some, and they must not dwell on land, some of them.

Now the complaint against Christians, it was the complaint against the evil trees, these that were not Christianity, valid trees in the garden of Christianity, for these were of other forests even if they had seemed to be of the right forests. Now these were really evil trees in the forest that did not belong with the forest, and these trees would cause the ruin of the forest for the rightful trees in the forest of Christianity, for there are many types of trees in the forest of Christianity, and yet some of those trees did not belong in that forest. Now these trees had spread, and there were more of those trees that did not belong, and they had gathered even, and become an evil army, these trees, and they had been gathered by enemies, to be an evil army, and some of them had even been planted by foreign nations, to attack a nation where the forest was found.

Now the venom of truth, it is not from dung, but the venom of false-truth, it is not from the wise, and the venom of the blind by Mala, it too is not from the wise. 

Now nation hacking is a powerful weapon, for though a nation is mighty, yet it may be killed by the flying spears and arrows, for they are fired from terrible constructions. Now this is the cold war of flying spears and terrible constructions. Now then in this time there are false snitches to disrupt and make disabled and there is apathy to sow towards the soldiers of the cities. Now the people are harassed that they might be fighting against their nation.

Now wisdom is made dung by dung, and yet those who are not offended by truth, these are those who have integrity.

Now then does not the self-esteem problem come about sometimes from what is not known and not understood? But some have dealt with worse things than others in this regard. 

Now gold and silver is the works of artists, and yet primitive has no regard for it, nor for the religious figure, who is silver and gold, being the weight of a golden Temple if it is so, for the primitive person has no regard of silver or gold. Now the weight of the angel, he is a trillion of the currency of Earth. Now indeed, eight-trillion is he.

Now the wives of an angel, they will also be called angels, and the wives of men, some, have been called angels. Now take not communion if it is condemnation, for you are having excellent understanding in a thing.

Now war because of arrogance, it is being a foolish war, and a burden a nation may become to the nations, but those who defend their nation, they are blessed by other nations.

Now what had not happened that was evil, that was not because of enemies during the cold war? But there is the other cold war that is between all the nations. Now the folly sown into society remained, and there were all types of clouds that continued this folly, and the clouds brought poisonous rain much and only some good rain, wisdom, did it bring, and this too was because of the cold war, it seemed. Now they had capatilism that was more like communism, and communism that was more like capatilism, and it was a strange thing, and the people hated capatilism, some, who actually hated communism. Now most things were only common sense, and the people made great efforts to worsen what they seeked to aid, and they pleaded upon democracy rather than seek truth and understand common sense, and remedy in Ria what must be remedied, for they were like a gentle people who pleaded and shed tears upon democracy in their actions, and yet they did not go out and tend to the garden, and they did not go out and build the constructions and tear down the evil, for leaders would hear them pleaing to democracy, and the leaders were as them, those who plead to democracy and who shed tears to democracy, and none was able to build what must be built, or to know what they should remove, or how to tend the garden, for they were a gentle people, having love, and they like a people saying, make it right and well, and the leaders were likewise, and there was no kind shepard among them, for only cruelty they perceived to hedge their borders for the shepard who would build and plant, these were a sharpened fence, sharpened with what was like knives, and these fences were in places, as warnings to the people, and so there was no real shepard for them, and the angel said, not their leader of the meeting place, though he is not a brazen and brutal man, for this is appreciated by me, but he is seeming noble, and yet not the director of the stones of Cessus, nor the captains of the host of David, and the geniuses, where are their voices? Now then I considered, I will give them wisdom, and they will gain wisdom from this type of shepherding that is with the wisdom, for there will be some shepherding with it, and it will all be good for wisdom, and they will be able to then plant and to remove and to make fences and bridges and smite the land with order and reason, for they harass their own people, being in anarchy, for in their quests for order, yet they do not build fences, and they harass their people instead, not knowing what else they should do, and they build bridges that cause folly, and they built not bridges where they are good, and good for riches and benefit, and they wallow in comfort of apathy, for the balance has brought an adequate peace for them, for they sacrifice much by allowing this unacceptable balance, and much luck they rely upon, and steadily the nation decays, and yet some still wallow, for they are not able to lead or permitted, and so the hot bath, the hot spring of comfort, it decays and the land decays, and they are being driven out of the hot springs in groups, and the last groups are still wallowing in comfort while the nation decays. Now I considered, they are never burdened by knowing their could be danger and enemies, but they are made only braver by it, for they are gaining might and comfort by greater knowledge and ability, for to know more does not take away their comfort, but knowledge gives them more comfort, so then let them have more wisdom and knowledge of dangers, for they are a capable people. Now they will take from the clouds of Jupiter, and they will be able to Shepherd, for the clouds should be dispersed upon all of the Earth.

Now be not an irrelevant piece of dung with your mouth, for if any has stepped upon dung, yet they did not expect dung with no integrity. Now irrelevant dung is another topic, for it has nothing with the topic, and is another thing. Now has a man stepped on dung, that dung of another topic flings about, for it is called other topic dung and it comes from stepping upon dung. Now where other topic dung comes with a slight step, yet the dung is very flexible dung. Now then give not dung for rebuke of integrity, for if dung goes to dung, yet it is not unexpected. Now do not wickedness for rebuke of justice, for if dung is stepped on by justice, yet it lashes out with wickedness.

Now the homo head, he is a misogynistic jack-ass, a homosexual, a man regardless of gender, and he is the fool concerning the man who is pretty.

Now the baby seal, they are not innocent, but they behave like wicked and blind children to the other things that are under the ice, and they are not blind, for they are only eating, and the other things under the ice also eat. Now the man above the ice, the Eskimo, he justly clubs the baby seal, but the adult seal he does not club, for it is not right, for the adult seal is being an adult and the Eskimo has no right to club them. Now then not all have been raised with money to grow up with more wealth, and these are in a colder world than others? But indeed it is so at times, for the wind is cold and the snow is being difficult, and from the snow he makes his home, and he eats and he has fire, and he constructs his tools, and happy are they also, but do they not consider, the things under the ice, they are better off than those who dwell above the ice, for considering it, the world above the ice is not as kind and it is difficult, and glide do the things under the ice, and traverse the land below ice, for it is not below Ur, but below ice, and they are having the riches of the land below ice. Now then have not the Eskimos all come from the seals? But the seals, two of them, have emerged as adults upon the ice, upon land, and they have sprouted legs, and they have become Eskimos, and from these Eskimos, they have a child, and there is the Eskimo who learns even better than them how to hunt and do such things as Eskimos do, and also the adults who were seals, they have become Eskimos, and they guide their child in the way of their new home above the ice, for they are Adam and Eve who inherit their new home above the ice, and they are Eskimos, and their child, more an Eskimo than them. Now then, considering, why do they work so hard to attain becoming Eskimos if the land under the ice, it is warmer and kinder, and has more in many ways? But some have wanted to be Eskimos, and they have been taught for their people, for their people's success and good, that to become an Eskimo is the best thing, and other things they have been taught to be, for their people's good, for much of the learning is the propaganda of war, and the learning that is taught when there is as if war. So they say, it is glamorous to be a thing as this, and they pat themselves upon the back much, as in war, for it is the morel of the people considering war with another people. Now then how does the child of the Eskimo regard it? But he has said, the land under the ice seems better in many ways, and yet he cannot do a thing for it.

Now the land of ice in the North, is may be called The Land of Glass, and there is the glass ceiling, which is ice, and it is not Ur, for it is a different land than that of the Ocean. Now the Eskimos come from seals that have come onto the ice and sprouted legs and arms, and become Eskimos, and the land below the glass, it is in many ways a land not known by the Eskimos. Now the Emporer, Nye Baker, he is an Eskimo child, born to Eskimos, and they came onto the ice and sprouted arms and legs, and their Eskimo son, he indulged in silver and gold, art, and he indulged in learning wisdom, for he was also Lucifer, and he was Dagon, and he went in the way of the Christ, and he lived in study, with books and paper, and he lived much as an Eskimo, and he was a prince bum, for he indulged much in learning and consideration, and who desired for him to be anything else? But would the blind stone, the communist conservative, would he call anymore any people a bum? But things of gold and silver are a bum to the blind stone, and what is the cause of the blind stone calling gold and silver things a bum? But has he even called The Temple that is gold, a bum? Now has he even called the village of gold, a bum? Now then the society of gold and silver, it is an advanced society, for it is a society of cities and Temples. Now then Eskimo, will you do business under the ice? But can it be so? But your efforts will wash away if you attempt to do business under the ice, for though they prosper who are there, yet will you? Now then prosper above the ice? But the Eskimo life is as it is, and those under the ice, some do not wish to come up onto land, for they say with their mouths, if only I was above the ice, and yet their hearts are strong-willed to remain below the ice, and with an Eskimo child they will not do much business, if any.

Now better for the Eskimo son to dwell with little money than to work the wrong labour of the business beneath the ice, for they are the fruits of the Eskimos who came through the ice. Now kept by the government in some ways, the fourth day has not come, and him who declared loser, he was better than those who were stubborn, for what had they become but a great hill and land of snow, being a great hill of it over all the land from east to west, for the Earth was still in an ice age and they feared the increase of temperature. Now reason we’re they and a hill that covered the land, and cold and stubborn, for they were a great hill of reason, and no further would they go to build upon reason for all was kept where it was and there were no buildings upon the land, not a single Temple, and no things built as signs and no cities, and upon the hill there were no people save for those who had come through the ice and their children and there were only the snow houses built by them and the lodgings that were not grande for those who would build great things were having to go below the ice. Now these reasonable people are a canopy of the rainbow and it must remain and him who declared loser, another canopy, part of another canopy that builds above the ice.

Now the Eskimo is a thing of Eretz Chadrack, and so is the Enoch, and these two things are part of the diary. Now the land of glass is a place of class, for the line of ice is the spiritual line of class, for it is called the glass boundary, and below the ice is a rich world of towns and even cities in many ways and they have as if different languages and there are worlds built under the ice and the Eskimo know much less of it than those who dwell below the ice and the glass ceiling is hazy from both sides. Now then they will not always do business with an Eskimo son, and it has been as a prophecy, the Inuit, for the raised wealthy are living like Eskimos, some of them, and yet even if the ice should melt in Ria, yet the line is still real, and who is Eskimo, it is most determined by being raised some way and they are not able to go below the ice and yet adult seals have turned into Eskimos. Now then Eskimos are bums, are they not, for the blind stone declares it, and declares it of their children and not those who came up through the ice. 

Now better for the Eskimo son to dwell with little money than to work the wrong labour of the business beneath the ice, for they are the fruits of the Eskimos who came through the ice. Now kept by the government in some ways, the fourth day has not come, and him who declared loser, he was better than those who were stubborn, for what had they become but a great hill and land of snow, being a great hill of it over all the land from east to west, for the Earth was still in an ice age and they feared the increase of temperature. Now reason were they and are and a hill that covered the land, and cold and stubborn, for they were a great hill of reason, and no further would they go to build upon reason for all was kept where it was and there were no buildings upon the land, not a single Temple, and no things built as signs and no cities, and upon the hill there were no people save for those who had come through the ice and their children and there were only the snow houses built by them and the lodgings that were not grand for those who would build great things were having to go below the ice and here was all of America, a great nation under the ice and all the Earth was covered by ice and snow and the great ice age was still upon the land. Now these reasonable people are a canopy of the rainbow and it must remain and him who declared loser, another canopy, part of another canopy that builds above the ice. Now then the spirit that declared loser, it was free of two armies that both held the people under the line of ice and snow that was a great hill of reason, and no further would they go to build, and reason were the two armies of people, with all their councillors who would not go further, and him who declared loser, he was called madness, for he would build without regard for either army, and build above the hill of ice and snow, for neither would he regard, and the clouds of Ariel, they too were as if beneath him, not regarded by him, so that all the ice and snow was disregarded by him, for he shovelled it away and the clouds too did not seem to hold him, and so the ice age was as nothing to him, for some said, he is madness, because he would build above the ice and snow, and he would clear reason away from places to build that there be things of reason. Now there were many women who hated him because he would clear away snow and ice and trees and things of nature from places, for he seemed brazen to them in his ways, what they saw with their eyes of Mala, and they despised him for this thing of clearing away parts of nature to build. Now there were many women also, who loved him, for they loved what he was, and there were men who loved him for him being king-like, and the snow and ice, the reason that was held, it despised him in many places, for he shovelled it away and disregarded its boundaries. Now this was so by Mala. Now no blessing can the angel give him, because he has his blessing from else-where, and the angel does not know where, for he did not depart from government without a blessing.

Now no animal was doing what Sasquatch did, and the beast having the number of the beast, it seemed to come with the storms of cold weather.

Now the volcanic activity seemed to increase for Edom where there was volcanic activity, and the methane pockets were erupting and evil, and it was a time of fighting and to be on guard, and dangerous was the land of Edom.

Now then women who are for nature, they must be what they are, and women who are for things built and buildings, they must be what they are, and the war is not evil, for the balance must be by the war, for these are the two armies in Mala, of women. Now then say not to any who is a good thing, convert to another way, for it is not right for any if they are a good thing.

Now then the canopies must all remain, for if any canopy is removed the Earth may come to ruin, for a nation may come to ruin, and so the reason canopy of the reasonable, they are political in their reason, and for fairness, and there was a woman called Hilary, and she was of the reason canopy, and some of the people despised her, and called her ways as being too bland, too boring, for they had wanted another canopy, and there was Trump, and he was another canopy, and Biden, who I call Joseph with greater respect than Biden, he was likely also of the reason canopy, and those who wanted another canopy, these were those who might also oppose Hilary, and her husband had been an ice structure of glory of an ice structure that was above the ice and likely he too was of the reason canopy.

Now the angry dog, he looks for excuse where there is none, for the flinch, the misstep and the small things, he is wishing to attack with great attack for these, and he snaps and growls and is having strong-will and motive to attack, and yet he does not do anything that Sasquatch would do.

Now those called mentally ill, they are not animals, for animals are what is called crazy, and those mentally challenged, they are not animals, for types of evil animals is what is called retarded, those who are methane fissures and such. Now then if an animal is also mentally ill, yet the mental illness is not the problem of it, for the mentally ill are not a hazard to any, for they are more peaceful than most people, and they are often only wanting to be left in peace, being peaceful. Now the evil and sick nimrods and retarded, they are not the mentally challenged, for the mentally challenged are only having less ability in some thing and will there not be found some mystery of them? Now when you understand the truth, the mentally ill and mentally challenged, these are beautiful people, and they are not of the ugly, and the animals and evil retards, these are not right to be called by their name, for the dung of Hitler is the spirit that would call them of the name of them. Now the dung is what Hitler rejected.

Now homo head, he is a type of chimp, or monkey, and he is even a gorilla, and he does not know the pretty man is not a woman. Now he is most often not a man who desires men, and yet sometimes he is. Now his ways are not the ways of men who desire men, for men who desire men, they are people, and they are having respect of decency, and they are not the sycophants, Sodomites, who are doing what they do for the reason of being a sycophant, for the men who desire men are different than them. Now men who desire men, they are not sodomites, who are another type of homosexual, and they are not monkeys or Gorillas. Now they are those who have respect of decency and are for the encouragement, the good of people, for such is their decency. Now then they are only guilty of fornication, and greeting these, when they have decency, has it ever caused any wrong for Christians? But if any of these is having a breech in the spirit, to be a temporary thing, or a consistent thing of perversity, indeed it is the breech in the spirit, and these should not be greeted for they are having a wicked thing as a poison that is wicked, and the poison is misanthropic, and will you not consider it seriously? Now then if any is having a breech in the spirit because of the drugs that have become addictive, yet are these having a thing that must be avoided? But they do not have to be avoided. Now then increase your learning and separate sheep from goats, for a Shepard can separate a sheep from a goat, but those who pass by, they see a flock and they are goats or sheep and it does not matter. Now the the homosexual, they are called the pool of clean water that exalts, for they are a cup of clean water in a cup of gold, and they are decency, for there is much decency with them. Now they are the cup of gold that is with the advanced people, the cup of gold that has clean water in it, and they are not the sodomites. Now the sodomites are having pedophiles, rapists, every disgusting and evil thing, for they are a wicked people, and they have sycophants, those who are wicked and foolish, who are sycophantic of spiritual things and things that are innocent and holy, that should not be looked upon without decency and a shut mouth upon the matter, unless it be for decency in praise, for there are holy things that to attack with wickedness is the number of the beast for people, for these things are private and innocent, and they are holy things, the wicked sycophantic, who is foolish, and without understanding, they are even for being wicked towards these things, for such are sodomites, and they are wicked and sycophantic. Now they are a wicked and violent, intense with hate, with cruelty and having no understanding, a wicked device are they in their wicked speaking, and already having the number of the beast, for they are the devil's battle device on Earth, and to hell they will return with the devil. Now them they are with in a thing, these are also the devil's devices, for the kingdom of the devil is not divided, that you not reason like a more primitive people, for like is with like, the devil with the devil, and no thing of God can commit errors that are departing from the Lord's people to be taken to hell, to be with the devil's people, for these are the things where people cannot sin and cannot commit error, for these are the borders of the kingdoms, and they go throughout all the Earth, winding which ways they go, and no person of the Lord's has ever fallen astray of them, for if they had they were never with the Lord's people, and no person of hell has ever betrayed the devil, for it is abomination and great wrong to them, for it rips them apart and kills them to do so. Now there is a great mote around the borders where the people are, and the mote is a deep ravine, and it is there, and the Lord's people are in a higher place and the devil's people in a very low place. Now the pure cups of gold, they are with the Lord's people, and they cannot own slaves, for they are a different thing, and it would be wrong for them, for they are cups of gold and pure water, and the devil's kingdom, it is the sewer, and the Lord's kingdom, as the land. Now on land are the atheists, if they are the real atheists. Now Zion is as seven lands radiating outwards, and there is a river, and the eighth land is Zion that is beyond the river, and it is the outlying lands, and it is the atheists, for they are as outcasts, and yet they are still Zion, and the borders are attacked when the eighth land is attacked, for it is foolish, it is considered, to not care about the eighth land, only because it is across the river. Now if it is rebuked with decency by other people, yet it should not be killed.

Now fight the methane bag, the methane pocket, unless it is dormant, unless it is at peace, for a methane bag is worse than dung, and yet the suns who are righteous, the retired leaders of nations, they remain suns until their body is dying, and the Priest King, forever he remains, and larger is he than them. Now is it not so that they are almost as large as him while they are in government? But they are great mountains while they are in government, many of them, depending upon their nation, for they guide the people and have ability, and yet they do not have ability over the other kings and over the second order of a nation, for there are many second orders, and some of them are what is called foreign influence and foreign war by cold war. 

Now the way of nations is eye for eye that reason is found, and yet if it escalates to the sword, it is open war. Now what is the chicken? But it is not a coward. But it is a rebellious pile of dung, with arrogant corn, for it is arrogant, and it pecks and is a filthy thing, and yet it is slaughtered and roasted and made good. Now then nations, slaughter your own nation, if it is become an arrogant chicken, and roast your nation that it is a pleasing and holy thing that sends up a good savour, for from the arrogant chicken comes the holy offering unto the Lord if it is slaughtered by its leaders and roasted. Now then slaughter your chicken, you leaders, and let it be a holy offering, a pleasing offering unto the Lord, for the angel gives you wisdom in this thing. Now then the people will be pleasing unto the Lord.

Now America, did he not say, the chicken that comes up to much riches and power, it bothers everybody and is arragant, and yet the angel has considered, when it is roasted, which is only natural, then it will be a pleasing thing, and will you not receive some of that chicken as a pleasing thing to you, for it will be roasted and be a pleasing thing.

Now if you stomp on dung, tell your wife, for it is only polite, for the dung may show up and it is only polite when she is casting it away.

Now then kill not and wash your hands, but wash your hands when you have committed good work if there is dirt on your hands. Now what man has blood on his hands when he has committed good work of building? But the blood is his own.

Now very sheltered and good spoiled is the woman who is really learning when her husband explains to her things that women know, but she is not a fool.

Now him who cleans his feet, he is being a man, for his mouth declares what he has committed, and him who washes his hands, he washes of small dirt and not great, for a man has dirt on his hands when he does good work of a man, and yet much dirt is an animal, and the blood of others a beast, for has a drunken murderer slumbled out to work? But a man has venture sober, and he keeps his hands with only a little dirt, and all the workers, too, they are having dirt on their hands as well, and it is small dirt, and yet him who has much dirt, he is an animal, for he is not a man and behaving as a man.

Now a prudent man, he is keeping himself clean where he goes, and he cleans himself where he goes, for peace is on his lips and the peaceful and good lips of prudence, for diplomatic the prudent man is called, and prudent he is, for the prudent are called diplomatic, and they are keeping themselves clean, and they are having good strategy. Now everywhere he or she goes, they have their servant with them, a servant of diplomacy, for they are diplomats, and they are having wisdom, being counted among the wise as being wise.

Now then why will you watch the entertainments to be spattered with dung that is dung you step on? But if they are able to spatter you with dung and it is dung to dung, for you step on dung and it is to dung spattered at you, for to step on dung is to get more dung, then will you then not consider, I will not go to the places where dung may be spattered at me, for men, even women, indeed I am indecent, they step upon dung and men and women are the enemy of the dung.

Now the dung is hateful, envious, bitter, wicked, without understanding, made to be found in prison, devices of Beelzebub, weapons of Beelzebub. Now there is the weapons of dung, covered in dung, worthless stones from the lake of fire, covered in dung, rocks of hell that are of hell, and so what is below Earth, that is in the sewer of below Earth, it is not mentioned much among the people, and yet it should not be found much even among the entertainments, for it gives bravery to dung, and removes its correction from it, and the poison from clouds, it softens people, and they become softened to rotten dung, for they are converted, and the poison rain has taken more people than should have been taken, and yet truth is a shield, and integrity, and intelligence is a shield. Now then in days of poison rain there is the bringing forth of the umbrella and the umbrella is good, for take it with you every place.

Now Absolom, he was not Dagon, or did the priest of Heaven act before the fourth day? Now David has been good to Dagon, for the philistines rebelled and followed the devil, and they failed to know what they should, and David did a good service for Dagon, and devil-witches David is taking seriously, as that which should be killed.

Now then David has not killed Uriah, and Uriah has attacked the Christ, and he has attacked Dagon much, and Lucifer has been a cold war soldier, and not a combat soldier, and it is not a safe world, and his nationality is Heaven, for there is a war in this area, and he gives loyalty to Eretz Chadrack, and no battle-bow has Dagon ever fired at a person.

Now the chicken cannot fly off the planet, and so it should be roasted that it is pleasing, and yet does not the chicken still wish to fly? Now it will be better to fly in a better way, a more holy way, as a sacrifice that is pleasing to the Lord, and the nations will receive portions that are pleasing, for it is a very large bird that is on Earth. Now if the bird pecks, is it not kicked in defence? But the bird is a rich and wealthy bird, for he has been with great greed to swallow up corn and there is corn even upon his head and wings, for he is a very wealthy bird, and an arrogant bird is he, strong and wealthy, and even a little viscous, this bird that resides upon Earth, and he will fly? Now then peace to the bird, declares Dagon, for the bird is not a fool, but wise, and it is able to perceive things of Mala, that is knows it is not perishing in becoming a sacrifice to God, but it is becoming an even better thing that continues on, for it is not a thing lacking wisdom, but spiritual ability this great bird has, that it knows of ascending to a better thing that is spiritual, for it wishes to fly, and yet it cannot fly from the planet, and it is large, and the planet too small, and there is not room for the bird and the strong nations that are on Earth, and so the bird is holy if it knows that it may ascend by becoming a sacrifice to the Lord, for it will become even greater, will it not, before it ascends in this way? For she will grow and implode, spiritually, and she will roast itself, and she will ascend as a good offering to the Lord, and she will be pleasing, and she will be transformed. Now this will be the good way of it, will it not, if things are continuing to wellness and what is well, or there will be some great tragedy if things are not continuing to wellness.

Now imperception disability is when a person seizes upon a real thing and then believes the millions of other things of reality are the utter opposite of what they are, for it is a sincere disability, for many things of reality are too high for them, that they seize on a thing too high for them and yet it is with one finger, and the rest of them is too low to stand up and see upon the higher level. Now these are a very low people who do this, for they speak low because they are low and do not know better, for they cannot see upon the higher plain.

Now then them who see from a better view, all the people are as if mostly blind to them, and yet if it is really so, do they not have compassion, even if they Shepard in way that is almost rough at times? Now a low thing being only wicked in condemning truth and righteousness and good, even innocence, like the Sasquatch, it is high up by the neck, for there is a rope about its neck. Now then rebuke justly, with truth, rebuking what is wrong, condemning what is wicked.

Now the sewage explosion, it may be terrorism, for if the sewage comes through at every chance, there is great intensity to the sewage, and it is likely a seismic event, or it is terrorism. Now then the rescuers save their people, for great people are them who the terrorism would be wanting to kill, and they are a people who will utterly remove the seismic event, for if it is placed there by the devil, it is able to be dismantled, for it is a weapon of seismic activity. Now then it may be terrorism if the whole of a seismic event is there, for it may be things of the lake of fire, and prostitutes of this type, and things of Sodom, and methane bags, and many types of dung, and wicked stones from hell that are covered in dung, and so there are those partnering with the devil to use his devices. Now devil-witches are likely there, and the men of David must dismantle the seismic activity.

Now then a loyal person flushes, for it is loyalty to the nation to flush dung, and even more faithful are they who flush the poison rain. Now do the people want Edom? But take your umbrella with you for poison rain falls from the clouds, and it will soften the people to mush corpses, and they will become things of dung, will they not? Now then there is that which is good and that which is evil, and the puritanical, they are only misanthropic when they are going beyond the limits of being puritanical. Now the puritanical lobby, it is misanthropic to people, for people are evil upon the Earth, for they are believed to be a wrong and sinful thing for the Earth, that they should be removed. Now these are also the INCEL, for there is no difference. Now the INCEL hates all life, for it is puritanical, and only animals it likes, for animals are blameless to them, and they are a primitive people, the INCEL, and believe that people are evil and that animals are what is right. Now love they do not regard, much less true love, and things of Mala they do not believe in, and things of greater value they do not believe in, and they believe not even in cattle for women, for they do not even mind their own business in such matters, for even such an evil idea is too great for them, for they are for being animals and people being animals, and they are an open pit, with water in it, and they are the stones of Esua, below the Earth, and they expand and consume, taking what they can into the pit, and who will not look upon it with terror, for it is not even worth considering that any should throw themselves down the great water-fall, for of course such is madness, is foolish, and the water-fall calls out, it is good, throw yourselves in, and the people will only consider it with horror, for such is obscene madness. Now then I have cursed Niagra Falls for it is madness, and it calls out as if with peace, throw yourselves in, and it is blasphemous to call out to say such. Now indeed a great thing it is, and should remain where it is.

Now the soldiers of Niagra Falls, the INCEL, they are an environmental tragedy that is continuing. Now the sewage problem is like an environmental tragedy, for the soldiers of cities have not flushed it, and disloyalty to the nation has not flushed it. Now the poison rain, it is industry of people. Now then the angel is considering, the people should be respecting the environment, and taking consideration for it, for the canopies never forbid them from anything, and they were free to do what pleased them. Now then the sea level is rising, for the soldiers of Niagra Falls, frigid waters, they march forth, and such is a flood of misanthropic waters that kill, for people die of the coldness of the waters, and they nation is consumed by them. Now for what reason does the sea-level rise? But has the sign not warned them that it was coming that the scientists found? For they claimed the sea-level would rise. Now did the scientists not find the sign of the poison clouds, for they claimed the atmosphere was being poisoned. Now then the sewers have flooded because of the rising sea-level and the sewage comes up to dwell upon land. Now is it not because of the poison clouds in many ways, and are there not other things that are causing the waters to flood? But the scientists are finding signs and the Magi are able in these things. Now the Magi are not a thing of any people, but they are a thing of any shade and people. Now then the baby seals will be clubbed more, and the Eskimo will be well and have a better climate, and he will build cities and Temples then and gold palaces, and things will be better for the Eskimo than they have ever been, for the fourth day comes, and the sea-level rises, and much of the land is taken, for a portion is taken, the sea-animals, they will remain below the water-line, and the Eskimo will come to greater things, and yet for the Earth, most of it, will it not be tragic, for a great portion of the Earth is flooded? Now so comes the fourth day, when the sea-levels rise, and it even causes seismic events, but not as great as could be, and also a plague, and most of humanity has survived it. Now then Dagon has come, and the Priest-King, the sun, and he judges the people, and gives truth from the rain, and an event happens in Fomolow, and light comes towards Earth. Now the Magi are able to study the Heavens and the signs, for there are signs every place, and they are able to say, it will change, the climate.

Now if you make the clouds clean of what is not clean, this too may aid you, and yet where the sea-level rises, there is a loop and it continues until it reaches a higher place, and the snow melts and the ice melts, for it is runaway climate, as they call it, for much might already be too late and yet it is good to fight, for the sewage must be removed for the good of the climate, and so that the people are able to survive, and the soldiers of Niagra falls, the figid water, it can be removed as much as can happen, and an Eskimo tells you, for the angel is an Eskimo, a fair shade, entirely polish.

Now the smooth river rocks of the river, let them remain upon the bottom of the river, for they are being churned up at times, and the rocks thrown into the Ocean sinks, and the rock upon the lake, it sinks, for even if it skips, it sinks, for the truth causes it to sink, for gravity, a thing of the Lord, it is real, and it causes what sinks to sinks, that even if it skips, it sinks, and the ship even sinks to the depths if there is a great hole in it, for a flawed ship sinks. Now the angel is a kami, a river, and eight-trillion is he, and so is his size upon the Earth, for he is as a river that goes through two nations or three, and the clouds of Jupiter, they are not him. Now a man, he is a rock, and if he throws himself upon the river, indeed he will sink, for he does not throw himself upon the land. Now when they throw a bad corpse who was a bad person into the river, indeed before it sinks, then the kami lord is hearing what they were, before they sink,  for the report comes to them of a horrible person, and the kami lord is not blaming you for the wicked fools, for he calls them the balls of a pedophile, and pieces of dung, and indeed if you are a good person, be swimming into the waters of the river, and yet it is not always appreciated when children swim in the waters of the river, but good people should be swimming in the waters of the river, and these are the respectful and good people, and Dagon is loving them, and they jump into the river, and Dagon hears them. Now then does he not hear the good people who have been slain, who have been thrown into the river? For Dagon is loving them also, and he hears what type of thing they were, that they were slain when they are upon the water's surface, and as they float down. Now love Dagon has for them, and they are good people and yet Dagon does not have need of the slain, for to swim in the water when you are a good person, it is more than sufficient. Now more wicked were thrown into the river, who were slain, than them who were doing good and who were right, who were slain, who were murdered, for it is out of proportion for my river, and women have come to my river who were good, who were no doubt slain, for I cannot tell if they were slain or if they swim, and were they not victims, and frightened were they and weary.

Now then Balaam, the beaver, he does not really cause problems for the river, a kami lord, and he is the engineer of what causes the river to pool before moving on as it would, for there are canopies that have been built and the people do not much know of them, and they are there, for they are layers of the canopies of the people in the grand scale of things that are politics. Now mostly he is blind.

Now all animals can be saved, for if the animals are within the boundaries of animals, they can be saved, and good it is to be a human animal, for if a person is one of the good things, it is good to be a human animal.

Now a soldier of combat is upon a horse, and the soldier of cold war, mostly being without battle-bows much, but still in an unsafe land, he is upon the donkey, or upon the colt, for him who kills, who builds Temples, who does these things, he is a person of horses, and him who does not do these things, he is a person of donkeys and colts. Now the doves are with the donkeys and colts, indeed the clouds, the meadow, and the roads.

Sign of the Sky

Along a lonely road, beyond a shadowed land,
there are things to see, my love, and there are things they'll understand,
when the gold is spent with love, when their need is pure as truth,
there will be the next dark sign, and they will all go back to youth,
when the clouds have parted ways, in a distant land beyond,
and the years have turned again, and the darkest night has gone,
when our eyes are lifted up, and the sunlight breaks the sky,
with a message from above, and the purest truth to replace the lie,

and all of this will be, then, yours and even mine,
for time will only be, then, eternity between the lines,
and all of this will know, then, what we knew at the start,
before we all fell down, before the Earth lost heart,

And your eyes seem to know, that this love is like wine,
and your heart could return, to what you wanted,
and if the light will die, there will be what is true,
the world will be again, if it's only me and you,
a world brand new,

A heart break without care, remorse turns towards love,
and comes back through the dark, it picks the pieces up,
the scattered years grew long, the days turned to bitter cold,
the world was filled with hate, and everything we were never told,
and I was just outcast, it seemed to take me through,
I felt this could succeed, if the world became brand new,
and nothing here was wanted, it seemed to slip away,
it came on with the distance, to become something they never say,


//

Now if any person considers the arrival of the Eagle, what does it do to the other birds? But does the coyote regard it? Does the cow? Now the Eagle arrives and the birds behave differently? But if a man goes out the birds behave differently, and the coyote behaves differently, and the cow behaves differently, and when the Lion arrives, the man even behaves differently, and if the rabbit arrives, there is that which behaves differently. Now when the sun rises, the rooster makes noise, and when the sun goes down, the bats take flight, for the sunlight is disappearing, and the field grows, and coyote regards the man, and the lion regards the man, and all of the animals regard him, and the lion roars at him, and the horse will eat from his hand.

Now if a spirit says, it is bad, but not adorable? Yet it says, I have love for you, for it is only a foolish thing of words that flutter about? Now it is an understanding spirit, is it not, for much is implied for this spirit, much assumed to be implied for all, for the spirit is of great ability in this thing, a different type of person, and he upholds another, indeed, supports another. Now then he is not a jealous spirit? But indeed a kind spirit, and a good spirit, and amazed this spirit that the other spirits do not understand him. Now water he is, and a good water, and with integrity is he, for he is an upright spirit, and a spirit that is upright in truth, for he is a spirit that has wisdom, and so then let this spirit be an eye for the wise men if they are able, for men have disapproved of him, and yet wisdom he has, and the kings have disapproved of him, and yet he is having integrity. Now then hated for being upright? For have you been too non-jealous, too good? 


A distance, a day-dream, a nightmare, a wrong scene,
a feeling, it moves on, it feels right, it goes wrong,
it's all like, I wanted, the day-light, seems haunted,
so anxious, so fine then, its real if, you pretend,
and the clouds, seem to be, a welcoming message,
from on far, the ships come, they landed, they all run,
for something, a pure hope, a reason, to give us,
all light and, all gifts when, we come through, we'll be fine then,
and alive, eternal, and walking, above the sky,
to just let go, to just float down, come find me, come save me,
it's the first time, I felt that, it was all mine, and it went out,
with the light of, clouds from on far, from a place there, from a bright star,
and the rings were, scattered out there, given to them, a true gift,
and it real if, you are only, naive too, like I'm naive,
cause it all leaves, in favour, with a love that, brings all pure gold,
and it comes from, over the sea, from the stories, that the young told,
and it unwinds, and it goes out, and its pure truth, and it finds out,
all the dark space, all the deep lands, when they arrived, on the Earth's sands,
just to walk on, just to believe, just to know what, it takes leave,
to just take all, of pure worth, of love and, the new re-birth,
cause it's falling, and its going, and its gaining, and its knowing,
and its eager, and its fading, and its leaving, and its staying,
because I was, not what I knew, and when I knew, it was all real,
just to have all, and to let go, and to return, and to then know,
the stars are, in the sky, the heavens, seem to find me,
the light comes, to Earth and, the light falls, there upon me,
and it feels like, for the first time, it is coming towards the new day,
and it seems like, it was always, something that the people would say, if they were young,

So if you know, then you know, that you can, gain more,
of the truth, if your eyes, take me to love, if you're in love,
if you fall, I will fall, I will be, where you fall,
if the time, goes to truth, then the light, will make everything new again,

//

Now there is the core of the person, and there is the second person, and the core IQ is having the qualities, kill or do nothing, and when it is kill it informs the second person to be jealous, and if there is lack of self-control it is against what is exceptional, whether very intelligent or some other thing of being exceptional, for it is having to be a thing much more exceptional than it or there will be no great motive by the core IQ to kill. Now the person is not conscious of the core reasoning, and the core IQ, and the intelligence they have, much of it is in the second person, the conscious self, so that they may only know that they are jealous. Now then the core IQ may be greater or lesser with some, so that the core IQ of a person may be mentally retarded, and the second person, having a higher IQ, and so there is sometimes such a great difference between the two IQ that there is a great offset for the person that results in anti-social behaviour when confronted with another domain of personality types, or a thing that is far more exceptional than it. Essentially the person may have been childish as a child, and yet as an adult it is only that they are an animal when confronted with many things, so that though the person may be considered intelligent, they are actually very dangerous or only anti-social with the inability to depart from their anti-social behaviour. This is a core IQ deficiency, where the core has selected kill, which offers alternative motive for the conscious part of the person.

The causes of the devil intermingle, and they are motives to the devil's people to form and lynch, to work together, for they bond with the many causes, and they are having the devil as their lord, for this is also a terrorist gang and it need not declare anything to others to join hands in a thing to do wickedness. Now those who are bonded to God, they do not operate in this way, and yet do they not see the dung that mingles with dung? Now those believed to be stubborn to the degree that they are with the devil and will not do what is right even to save their lives, yet it is true, for it is indeed that these are not only knowing they are evil, but they are firmly committed to the devil, and there is no hope for them, or no believe in such hope with them, for they are wanting to do the devil's will, for their heart is as the devil's heart in many things, and they are indeed come from hell, for they are the devil's people, and there is no hope concerning them, for only reason they will have if there is sure threat against them from something, and it is not as when a person does what is right. Now these people are not bonded to God, but they are bonded to a canopy on Earth, some of them, and it is a semi-nihilism of risk and reward, for they are the people of no understanding or integrity, and no morality, for they have no substance, and their frontal lobe has bonded with the canopy that is in the world, and they are exterior to themselves in this, for they are risk and reward and not any morality or righteousness. Now these are obedient beyond their own capacity for any will of their own, and yet them who are fearing God, they are having integrity. Now the mentally retarded core IQ, it must be developed by truth and integrity and then self-control, else the person may be anti-social, and the mentally retarded they are either kill or do not kill, and those who are kill, they devour like a dangerous flood and they lynch in every place that which is more exceptional than them. Now there is a difference between mentally challenged and mentally retarded.

Now if a person has a low core IQ, a retarded core IQ, and it is set to kill for a person, for it happens randomly, then there is nothing to be done but what must be to defend a person, for it has happened for no reason, and the core IQ is set to kill, being a retarded core IQ that can be set to kill randomly. Now if it triggers wrath and jealousy both, even anger, then the core IQ is capable, and there may be more wrath than any thing from the core IQ. Now it is called Kursh core disability.

Now the soldiers of Niagra Falls, they are frigid waters, and they drive people up the mountain of Japeth, for they drive towards neo-nazi things, and yet it is not necessary, for when people are following the ways of the neo-nazis, the dark shade is not offended and does not even notice, and it is a thing as if not even existing, and they are only offended when the mountain of Japeth is not there for them, for it is an advanced thing of Mala that I write of, that the dark shade is receiving greater good and lack of smothering and bullying when the mountain of Japeth is established, for disorder becomes bullying, smothering, chaos, abuse, and many evil things, and it is an advanced thing of the very wise, for the dark shade is liberated the second time by the mountain of Japeth, and peace comes, for the mountain of Japeth is good. Now then reason not like children, for whom wisdom is too high, if they are such a type of child, for when wisdom is too high for a person, they cause chaos with what they have heard and learned, but when wisdom is not too high, they use wisdom rightly, for they call it being an adult, to be using wisdom rightly and to not be those for whom wisdom is too high. Now then America flies, and it is golden, and the arrogant chicken, yet it cannot fly anywhere, and it grows strong, for it must grow strong and it wishes to fly that it grows strong in this pursuit, and yet every chicken must become enlightened if it is not already, and come to the enlightenment of how to really fly if it is a chicken, for it grows strong and says, flying is something different, for if I wish to fly I ascend to God. Now then the chicken will have its real leaders rising up within it, and it will roast itself and ascend and then fly, for then it will fly by ascension to the Lord, for it is a thing of enlightenment. Now then it may be able to have peace with America, that flies, for then it will return as a bird that can fly, and the type of bird, who can know? Now will it then be a peaceful bird that can fly?

Now then for the soldiers of Niagra Falls, take it much further your war, and go to the ultimate limit, and so then fight the war with yourself no more against people, for there is a breech in your abdomen, and so fight harder and that you fight against yourself, and fighting even more, and going further to the limit, until you fight hard enough that you do nothing to others again, for you have not been fighting and you have not been progressing, for fight then against the devil, and attain your place upon land, and be abandoning the icy water at the pit of Niagra Falls, for you are those who have gone over the water-fall, and you have fallen down into the pit of it, so that you must fight harder, and multiply your efforts to fight, that you emerge upon land and abandon the ice, and then fight harder to go to warmth.

Now the Giant Sasquatch has come from the depths of hell, the natural brute beast of the devil, and the parasites of him, they are such natural brute beasts, all having taken the number of the beast, that they are more than child killers, and so do not even regard that they are child killers, for they are many things, almost all things, that are brutal killing machines, for they are too many brutal and evil things to even know that they are child killers and pedophile defenders, and they are all not able to control themselves anymore, for though they relent a moment, pause a moment, yet they cannot control themselves, and the deception soon takes them again, for they are devices of the devil, and they have taken the number of the beast that they are not people, men and women, anymore. Now these are the fingers of the Giant Sasquatch, the beast of the devil, for it is a very large beast, and too large for all of the soldiers of David to bring down, for he is very much greater than them and all their efforts, and they may only hope to take a hand of him, and the hand will re-grow and he will continue to be a killing machine, for his finger repents for a momen,t and yet soon it will attack again, and a man who is a warrior is not a fool to relent fighting because in combat his enemy repents for a few seconds, for it is not the same as repentence and total surrendor of the beast, and even if it was, it would be too late for such things, for a man who is a warrior is not deceived by this, for he only fights the same if his enemy repents a little for a few seconds, for the beast is a killing machine, and it fights, and if all the soldiers are able to take its hand, indeed it will calm for a time and return to its ice-hell, and then it will return when its hand is re-grown, and it will have learned and grown fierce again, and it will say, who took my hand? For it will then increase its efforts, having learned, against them who took its hand, and it will go with its great fingers when they are at peace and not fighting, when they are at peace and without ability to fight, and places not for fighting, for he is a wicked brute beast, the giant Sasquatch, and he will kill them where they are not able to fight him, for he will ambush them this way, for he has no honour, the Sasquatch, for he will take his revenge for his hand you cut from him, and he will know that you must be killed if he is to win in the future. Now then Lucifer will hack at him, for it is an ongoing war of the angel Lucifer, and he will rest, and be at peace to pursue wisdom and give wisdom, and he will go out quickly again to hack at Sasquatch, for he goes out constantly to hack away at him, for he is the giant Sasquatch, and he looses fingers, and he will not be at peace if an angel takes his fingers, and he brings with him the rising ice, for he comes often from below the ice, for he has emerged from below the ice, and when he comes up to fight, a flood comes out before him of ice and frigid water, and the angel hacks at him, for he is a slow a brutal beast, and a wicked and brutal killing machine, for the child is the same as the man, and the cripple, the same as the able to him, and the all things at peace, he kills them, for he has no honour, for he is a natural brute beast, and he has no regard of kings, or children, or the religious figure, or anything holy, and so the angel says, let David learn wisdom quickly, for he is able, and he will fight with me, and he will not lose a single man, for Sasquatch has no armour, and he is a dumb and slow beast, and yet terribly wicked, and the parasites of him are devil-witches with bludgeons and wicked devices, and yet they have no armour against the battle-bow of David, no armour against the knife to the back of the neck, and what training would even be required to kill them? But these are fingers of Sasquatch, and yet Sasquatch himself is too big for all the host of David, and Cessus is required as well, Prince Rellium, Adonijeh, indeed all the hosts of the land of Eretz Chadrack, for by sheer size the angel is not able to kill all of him easily, and yet the might of the Lord is able to send him back to hell, for he comes from the depths of an ice-hell, and when he emerges, the floods come, and the sewers have flooded, and the pests of the sewer have been on land, for all the sewer has come up onto land because of the floods of giant Sasquatch as he comes upon land. Now then one of the Eskimo was an angel, and did the people know? Now the fair shade Eskimo, entirely polish, he dwells into the good lodgings of the more technically advanced Eskimo, where they have good lodgings, and he is never growing tired of fighting with the giant Sasquatch, for the might of the Lord will send him back to hell. Now do not fight me, giant Chicken, for I already fight Giant Sasquatch, and he is a threat to all the Earth, for he is much the size of a large nation in his ability, and in his numbers, for he is not the Sasquatch of men, or kings, but he is the Sasquatch of the Garden that has Cessus and Cias as stones, and the serpent as the river that goes through two or three nations, and so Sasquatch is a threat to the great chicken and to America, though America is able to fight him well, as is the great chicken, and yet all the great things must join to fight the Sasquatch, and yet the angel will fight him regardless.

Now do not exploit what you do not know to abandon common sense, but keep common sense in all your learning, and in all your gaining of wisdom.

Now giant Sasquatch comes up from the deep, and Lucifer fights him, and those who are the devil's devices, they will not repent for long before they are deceived again to fight, for they do not have a choice anymore but to fight for the devil, for he is their lord and drives them forward with great motive of heart, and soon their reason follows their heart, or else they will be ruined.

Now then all the disabilities must be discovered and those who are a danger to others, for your system is not large enough for all of them, and the business people must also identify foreign agents.

Now what is owed will be taken if not paid, for land will be seized and possessions will be seized and even disease may come, and curses from mala that act upon Ria, and so therefore be fearing God and considering Him.

Now an angel is from Heaven, and not from land, and a tornado from the clouds and not from the land.

Now the sixth sense of a lion, is perceives a greater area and it is as a good magic of Mala.

Now then there will be men who judge the lake of fire, and it will only be being a man, and the women are upon a cliff and they have no interest in the lake of fire, for judge or not, it is not things that are concerning them and their land, nor the land of the men that they are in, for to believe so that the lake of fire concerns them, it is only confusion for them, and they reach the edge of the cliff. Now so the diary offers it with greater ease, and the religious seekers, the gurus, they are upon the donkey and the colt.

Now then if a plain is too high for you, you are not fullfilling what is on this plain, to dwell on this plain, for be not degrading to those in your realm because you climb up onto the ice and do not fulfill the things of being upon the ice and land, for childish it is, for ignorantly you grasp at a thing of knowledge, and to be degrading. Now the psychologist must yeild where they must yeild, or the next portion of their council will be lies, for to the truth they must keep, yeilding where truth takes them to truth, for it is also yeilding, for they are becoming greater, and then they are becoming small, and the smaller thing is the greater thing, for by continueing with truth, to yeild where they must, indeed they become small and greater, and they will begin smart, and they will become stupid when they have gained much knowledge, and when they have gained so much that they are stupid, then they are walking by the truth that they gain, and they will gain more, and they will have fulfilled what is beneath the ice, for all of that land they will have fulfilled, and they will be a condensed flame that burns brighter than the fire, for they come to Tarzan, who knows the jungle better than them, indeed much better as the difference between day and night on land, and not to a man do they come, but they will come to a kami lord, and those who are not worthy to untie his sandals, they are worthy to sit at his right side, and those who take drink, and are at peace, they are worthy to be moons, and large moons in the Heavens, and those who are offended, they are as them who are lacking that they will want to gain more knowledge, and those who do not understand the greatness, as animals that are fit to be slaves.

Now then let the seal be adult seals, and they will sprout arms and legs, and they will walk upon land, for they recruit, the scoundrels who encourage to join the bandits, and they encourage them with much lies that they might work greatly to gain their skills that will be for them, and then they are adults, and vanished is all the promises, for they have gain much from being smart to being stupid, and then they are intelligent, for ability they have, and yet a baby seal is a thing like that with self-esteem problems, and yet it does not have them, and yet it is lacking arms and legs, for it has not fulfilled above that is upon land, and not even an adult seal is it, for it must be an adult before any hope of having arms and legs, and having read knowledge is not the same as them who give knowledge, for the sun gives light, and the moon gains the light and gives the light that is given, and such is a messenger of gods, for they are the prophets and messengers of those who give knowledge and give light and truth, for to read knowledge is a thing of diligence and to give truth, a thing of what it is, for those who read knowledge do not curse them who give knowledge, for why will they curse the intelligent if they claim intelligence because of what they receive from the intelligent? But whether they are intelligent, who read, is irrelevant, for only diligence is required, for these are only worthy to be called diligent, and then the people will say, they are also smart, if they are stupid so that they are an adult seal, and yet if they are a child, a mentally retarded, for it is knowledge that is with sentience, and it is in the other realm, the other domain of sentience, that by the authority of sentience, people have right to declare these things, for sentience is a mist that cannot be stolen by any or guarded, and the mist has light in it, and stars, then the people will say, it is mentally retarded, and even their diligence could not cure their retardation, so that they are being understood to be more retarded than any knew, for what could cure them? Now these will be odious people among the people, and yet the adult seal, they are those understanding the lies of encouragement of those who wanted for them to be diligent and do well, that then the lies are vanished, and they are an adult, and they will be coming onto the land and sprouting arms and legs, and they will be gaining the wisdom that is upon land, and they will be Eve of the garden, and an Adam, and the garden will be there for them, for Lucifer has given them some knowledge of the Garden, and he sells fruit to Mars, that they will be a god, and he gives suns to what is worthy, what is righteous, and Anothoth is called righteousness also, and they will be excelling, for they will have wisdom and knowledge, and they will know of Zion and Sion and of Jerusalem, and they will have surpassed the Ocean.

Now then throw snow at the enemy and lure them to a gift, for the enemies are not enemies, but they are worthless things not worthy to be enemies to anything.

Now then the baby seal that is destroying society, bullying at sentience, will you not deal with it? But will you not drive it away? For if the baby seal is an adult, and yet it is still a child, it was retarded and more so than they knew, and so it is an odious thing.

Now then you seals who have sprouted arms and legs, go from the garden to the mountain, and ascend, for it become far more difficult for you having arms and legs, and you are only beginning to gain wisdom, and a little you have gained, and you are only gathering sticks to be great, and there is much more to gain and to attain, and there is no thing that is at its height, and further there is, and always more, and so then use the might that has come from the seal, the ability of it, for knowledge was gained, and the Eskimo son or daughter knows almost nothing of it, and so you will also ascend the mountains, and you will combine all wisdom and find religion or accept atheism, and you will cast off ignorance, and you will make right what is not true, and so you will fight as those of another plain, and they wage war upon every plain, and the devil's people will be separated from the Lord's, and the atheists will be counted with the Lord's, for they are even as a wall, a hedge of rocks and mountains, and some of the women who have sprouted arms and legs, whether coming from great education or not, for there is education regardless and who can say how much, some of them will become Anothoths, and by Saturn, too, it may be gained, for Saturn aids in this, for Jupiter is given, for she will gain wisdom upon wisdom, and want for good things, having the Lord's will, and she will be in Bethlehem, and she will attain, for gathered it may be, all the people outside the wall, and they may be gathered to the mountains, that they may ascend, and they may be entering into Sion and Zion, as they have already entered, and been born in it, and upon mountains they will dwell, and they will dwell among the higher places, and what they left behind, it will descend, for it did not join, and it fell away to the depths, to be people of the devil, to become sewage, and it will no longer be considered, for the people do not consider sewage, and what emerged, it will be attaining wisdom, and eternal life is offered, life unto life, and they will live forever, for they will even attain heavenly form.
 









 

























